Nebraska, session 109, LB298.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. Sections 1 to 18 of this act shall be known and may be cited
as the Office of Public Counsel Act.
Sec. 2. Section 81-8,240, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
81-8,240 As used in the Office of Public Counsel Act sections 81-8,240 to
81-8,254, unless the context otherwise requires:
(1) Administrative agency shall mean any department, board, commission, or
other governmental unit, any official, any employee of the State of Nebraska
acting or purporting to act by reason of connection with the State of Nebraska,
any corporation, partnership, business, firm, governmental entity, or person
who is providing health and human services to individuals or service delivery,
service coordination, or case management under contract with the State of
Nebraska and who is subject to the jurisdiction of the office of Public Counsel
as required by section 73-401, any regional behavioral health authority, any
community-based behavioral health services provider that contracts with a
regional behavioral health authority, and any county or municipal correctional
or jail facility and employee thereof acting or purporting to act by reason of
connection with the county or municipal correctional or jail facility; but
shall not include (a) any court, (b) any member or employee of the Legislature
or the Legislative Council, (c) the Governor or his or her personal staff, (d)
any political subdivision or entity thereof except a county or municipal
correctional or jail facility or a regional behavioral health authority, (e)
any instrumentality formed pursuant to an interstate compact and answerable to
more than one state, or (f) any entity of the federal government; and
(2) Administrative act shall include every action, rule, regulation,
order, omission, decision, recommendation, practice, or procedure of an
administrative agency.
Sec. 3. Section 81-8,241, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
81-8,241 The office of Public Counsel is hereby established to exercise
the authority and perform the duties under the Office of Public Counsel Act
provided by sections 81-8,240 to 81-8,254, the Office of Inspector General of
Nebraska Child Welfare Act, and the Office of Inspector General of the Nebraska
Correctional System Act. The Public Counsel shall be appointed by the
Legislature, with the vote of two-thirds of the members required for approval
of such appointment from nominations submitted by the Executive Board of the
Legislative Council.
Sec. 4. Section 81-8,242, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
-1-

LB298 LB298
2025 2025
81-8,242 The Public Counsel shall be a person well equipped to analyze
problems of law, administration, and public policy , and during such person's
term of office shall not be actively involved in partisan affairs. No person
may serve as Public Counsel within two years of the last day on which such
person served as a member of the Legislature , or while such person is a
candidate for or holds any other state office , or while such person is engaged
in any other occupation for reward or profit.
Sec. 5. Section 81-8,243, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
81-8,243 The Public Counsel shall serve for a term of six years, unless
removed for cause as determined by a two-thirds vote by vote of two-thirds of
the members of the Legislature or, if the Legislature is not in session, by a
two-thirds vote of the members of the Legislative Council upon their
determining that the Public Counsel has become incapacitated or has been guilty
of neglect of duty or misconduct. If the office of Public Counsel becomes
vacant for any reason cause, the deputy public counsel shall serve as acting
public counsel until a successor Public Counsel is has been appointed for a
full term. The Public Counsel shall receive such salary as is set by the
Executive Board of the Legislative Council.
Sec. 6. Section 81-8,244, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
81-8,244 (1) (1)(a) The Public Counsel may select, appoint, and compensate
as the Public Counsel he or she sees fit, within the amount available by
appropriation, such assistants and employees as the Public Counsel he or she
deems necessary to discharge the responsibilities under the Office of Public
Counsel Act. The Public Counsel sections 81-8,240 to 81-8,254. He or she shall
appoint and designate one assistant to be a deputy public counsel, one
assistant to be a deputy public counsel for corrections, one assistant to be a
deputy public counsel for institutions, and one assistant to be a deputy public
counsel for public welfare services.
(2) (b) Such deputy public counsels shall be subject to the control and
supervision of the Public Counsel.
(3) (c) The authority of the deputy public counsel for corrections shall
extend to all facilities and parts of facilities, offices, houses of
confinement, and institutions which are operated by the Department of
Correctional Services and all county or municipal correctional or jail
facilities.
(4) (d) The authority of the deputy public counsel for institutions shall
extend to all mental health institutions and facilities operated by the
Department of Health and Human Services, to all veterans institutions operated
by the Department of Veterans' Affairs, and to all regional behavioral health
authorities that provide services and all community-based behavioral health
services providers that contract with a regional behavioral health authority to
provide services, for any individual who was a patient within the prior twenty-
four months of a state-owned and state-operated regional center, and to all
complaints pertaining to administrative acts of the department, authority, or
provider when those acts are concerned with the rights and interests of
individuals placed within those institutions and facilities or receiving
community-based behavioral health services.
(5) (e) The authority of the deputy public counsel for public welfare
services shall extend to all complaints pertaining to administrative acts of
administrative agencies when those acts are concerned with the rights and
interests of individuals involved in the public welfare services system of the
State of Nebraska.
(6) (f) The Public Counsel may delegate to members of the staff any
authority or duty under the Office of Public Counsel Act sections 81-8,240 to
81-8,254 except the power of delegation and the duty of formally making
recommendations to administrative agencies or reports to the Governor or the
Legislature.
(2) The Public Counsel shall appoint the Inspector General of Nebraska
Child Welfare as provided in section 43-4317. The Inspector General of Nebraska
Child Welfare shall have the powers and duties provided in the Office of
Inspector General of Nebraska Child Welfare Act.
(3) The Public Counsel shall appoint the Inspector General of the Nebraska
Correctional System as provided in section 47-904. The Inspector General of the
Nebraska Correctional System shall have the powers and duties provided in the
Office of Inspector General of the Nebraska Correctional System Act.
Sec. 7. Section 81-8,245, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
81-8,245 The Public Counsel shall have the power to:
(1) Investigate, on complaint or on the Public Counsel's his or her own
motion, any administrative act of any administrative agency;
(2) Prescribe the methods by which complaints are to be made, received,
and acted upon; determine the scope and manner of investigations to be made;
and, subject to the requirements of the Office of Public Counsel Act sections
81-8,240 to 81-8,254, determine the form, frequency, and distribution of the
Public Counsel's his or her conclusions, recommendations, and proposals;
(3) Conduct inspections of the premises, or any parts of such premises
thereof, of any administrative agency or any property owned, leased, or
operated by any administrative agency as frequently as is necessary, in the
Public Counsel's his or her opinion, to carry out duties prescribed under the
Office of Public Counsel Act sections 81-8,240 to 81-8,254;
(4) Request and receive from each administrative agency, and such agency
-2-

LB298 LB298
2025 2025
shall provide, the assistance and information the Public Counsel counsel deems
necessary for the discharge of the Public Counsel's his or her
responsibilities; inspect and examine the records and documents of all
administrative agencies notwithstanding any other provision of law; and enter
and inspect premises within any administrative agency's control;
(5) Request the issuance of Issue a subpoena, enforceable by action in an
appropriate court, to compel any person to appear, give sworn testimony, or
produce documentary or other evidence deemed relevant to a matter under the
Public Counsel's his or her inquiry as provided in section 18 of this act . A
person thus required to provide information shall be paid the same fees and
travel allowances and shall be accorded the same privileges and immunities as
are extended to witnesses in the district courts of this state and shall also
be entitled to have counsel present while being questioned;
(6) Undertake, participate in, or cooperate with general studies or
inquiries, whether or not related to any particular administrative agency or
any particular administrative act, if the Public Counsel he or she believes
that such general studies or inquiries they may assist the Legislature in
enhancing enhance knowledge about or making lead to improvements in the
functioning of administrative agencies;
(7) Make investigations, reports, and recommendations necessary to carry
out the Public Counsel's his or her duties under the State Government
Effectiveness Act;
(8) Carry out his or her duties under the Office of Inspector General of
Nebraska Child Welfare Act. If any of the provisions of sections 81-8,240 to
81-8,254 conflict with provisions of the Office of Inspector General of
Nebraska Child Welfare Act, the provisions of such act shall control;
(9) Carry out his or her duties under the Office of Inspector General of
the Nebraska Correctional System Act. If any of the provisions of sections
81-8,240 to 81-8,254 conflict with the provisions of the Office of Inspector
General of the Nebraska Correctional System Act, the provisions of such act
shall control;
(8) (10) Investigate allegations of violation of subsection (2) of section
84-908 by an administrative agency pursuant to a complaint made to the Public
Counsel's his or her office and make a determination as to whether such
administrative agency has violated such subsection. The Public Counsel shall
report the Public Counsel's his or her determination in writing to the
Governor, the Secretary of State, the Attorney General, the Executive Board of
the Legislative Council, and the director or chief executive officer of the
agency. The report to the executive board shall be submitted electronically;
and
(9) (11) Investigate and address the complaint and case of:
(a) Any juvenile committed to the custody of a youth rehabilitation and
treatment center; and
(b) Any juvenile released from a youth rehabilitation and treatment center
for reentry into the community, while that juvenile is subject to the Community
and Family Reentry Process and a service or treatment program in which the
juvenile may be involved after the juvenile's his or her release from a youth
rehabilitation and treatment center, whether that service or program is
administrated by the Office of Juvenile Services or a private provider in the
community. The Office of Juvenile Services and private providers in the
community shall cooperate with any investigation conducted by the Public
Counsel pursuant to this subdivision and provide all documentation and
information requested by the Public Counsel in connection with such an
investigation.
Sec. 8. Section 81-8,246, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
81-8,246 (1) In selecting matters for attention, the Public Counsel shall
particularly review an administrative act that might be:
(a) (1) Contrary to law or regulation;
(b) (2) Unreasonable, unfair, oppressive, or inconsistent with the general
course of an administrative agency's judgments;
(c) (3) Mistaken in law or arbitrary in ascertainments of fact;
(d) (4) Improper in motivation or based on irrelevant considerations;
(e) (5) Unclear or inadequately explained when reasons should have been
revealed; or
(f) (6) Inefficiently performed.
(2) The Public Counsel may also work to strengthen procedures and
practices which lessen the risk that objectionable administrative acts will
occur.
Sec. 9. Section 81-8,247, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
81-8,247 (1) The Public Counsel may receive a complaint from any person
concerning an administrative act. The Public Counsel shall conduct a suitable
investigation into the things complained of unless the Public Counsel believes
that:
(a) (1) The complainant has another remedy available which the complainant
could reasonably be expected to use;
(b) (2) The grievance pertains to a matter outside the Public Counsel's
power;
(c) (3) The complainant's interest is insufficiently related to the
subject matter;
(d) (4) The complaint is trivial, frivolous, vexatious, or not made in
good faith;
-3-

LB298 LB298
2025 2025
(e) (5) Other complaints are more worthy of attention;
(f) (6) The Public Counsel's resources are insufficient for adequate
investigation; or
(g) (7) The complaint has been too long delayed to justify present
examination of its merit.
(2) The Public Counsel's declining to investigate a complaint shall not
bar the Public Counsel from proceeding on the Public Counsel's own motion to
inquire into related problems. After completing consideration of a complaint,
whether or not it has been investigated, the Public Counsel shall suitably
inform the complainant and the administrative agency involved.
Sec. 10. Section 81-8,248, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-8,248 Before announcing a conclusion or recommendation that expressly
or impliedly criticizes an administrative agency or any person, the Public
Counsel shall consult with such that agency or person.
Sec. 11. Section 81-8,249, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-8,249 (1) If, having considered a complaint and whatever material the
Public Counsel deems pertinent, the Public Counsel is of the opinion that an
administrative agency should (a) consider the matter further, (b) modify or
cancel an administrative act, (c) alter a regulation or ruling, (d) explain
more fully the administrative act in question, or (e) take any other step, the
Public Counsel shall make recommendations to the administrative agency. The If
the Public Counsel so requests, the agency may shall, within the time
specified, inform the Public Counsel about the action taken on such
recommendations or the reasons for not complying with them.
(2) If the Public Counsel believes that an administrative action has been
dictated by a statute creating whose results that are unfair or otherwise
objectionable, the Public Counsel shall notify the Legislature of the Public
Counsel's such views concerning desirable statutory change.
Sec. 12. Section 81-8,250, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-8,250 The Public Counsel may report conclusions and suggestions by
transmitting them to the Governor, the Legislature or any of its committees,
the press, and others who may be concerned. When publishing an opinion adverse
to an administrative agency, the Public Counsel shall include any statement the
administrative agency may have made to the Public Counsel by way of explaining
its past difficulties or its present rejection of the Public Counsel's
proposals.
Sec. 13. Section 81-8,251, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-8,251 (1) In addition to whatever reports the Public Counsel he or she
may make from time to time, the Public Counsel shall no later than on or about
February 15 of each year report to the Clerk of the Legislature and to the
Governor concerning the exercise of the Public Counsel's his or her functions
during the preceding calendar year. The report submitted to the Clerk of the
Legislature shall be submitted electronically. In discussing matters with which
the Public Counsel he or she has dealt, the Public Counsel need not identify
those immediately concerned if to do so would cause needless hardship. If So
far as the annual report criticizes any may criticize named agencies or
officials, the report it must include also include the their replies of the
named agencies or officials to such the criticism. Each member of the
Legislature shall receive an electronic copy of such report by making a request
for it to the Public Counsel.
(2) On or before December 15 of each year, the Public Counsel shall submit
a report electronically to the Clerk of the Legislature as required under
section 83-104 regarding state institutions.
Sec. 14. Section 81-8,252, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-8,252 If the Public Counsel has reason to believe that any public
officer or employee has acted in a manner warranting criminal or disciplinary
proceedings, the Public Counsel shall refer the matter to the appropriate
authorities.
Sec. 15. Section 81-8,253, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-8,253 (1) No proceeding, opinion, or expression of the Public Counsel
shall be reviewable in any court. Neither the Public Counsel nor any member of
the Public Counsel's staff shall be required to testify or produce evidence in
any judicial or administrative proceeding concerning matters within the Public
Counsel's official cognizance, except in a proceeding brought to enforce the
Office of Public Counsel Act sections 81-8,240 to 81-8,254.
(2) Reports of investigations conducted by the Public Counsel are not
public records for purposes of sections 84-712 to 84-712.09.
Sec. 16. Section 81-8,254, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-8,254 (1) A person who willfully obstructs or hinders the proper
exercise of the Public Counsel's functions, or who willfully misleads or
attempts to mislead the Public Counsel's inquiries, shall be guilty of a Class
II misdemeanor. No employee of the State of Nebraska , who files a complaint
pursuant to the Office of Public Counsel Act sections 81-8,240 to 81-8,254,
shall be subject to any penalties, sanctions, or restrictions in connection
with such employee's employment because of such complaint.
(2) Consistent with the Nebraska Rules of Professional Conduct, counsel
-4-

LB298 LB298
2025 2025
for the administrative agency that is the subject of an investigation by the
office of Public Counsel shall not represent a witness. A witness may request
that agency counsel be present while being questioned, but the administrative
agency shall not require a witness to make such a request. If such a request is
made, the administrative agency shall inform the witness that agency counsel
does not represent the witness.
Sec. 17. (1) Except as otherwise provided by law, any confidential
information or confidential records shared with the office of Public Counsel
shall remain confidential and shall not be shared by an employee of the office
with any person who is not an employee of the office, including any member of
the Legislative Oversight Committee.
(2) The office of Public Counsel and the Division of Legislative Oversight
may share confidential information as necessary to carry out the
responsibilities of such office and division. Such sharing of confidential
information shall include, but not be limited to, the sharing of confidential
information when necessary to refer complaints between such office and division
and to assist in investigations and the resolution of complaints. The office of
Public Counsel and the Division of Legislative Oversight, at the discretion of
the Public Counsel and the Director of Legislative Oversight, may coordinate to
work jointly on complaints and investigations in circumstances of overlapping
jurisdiction.
(3) If any employee of the office of Public Counsel knowingly divulges or
makes known, in any manner not permitted by law, confidential information or
confidential records, it shall be grounds for dismissal.
Sec. 18. (1) At the request of the Public Counsel, the Executive Board of
the Legislative Council, by a majority vote, may issue subpoenas in connection
with a specific inquiry or investigation undertaken pursuant to the Office of
Public Counsel Act to compel the production of records and information and
sworn testimony or other evidence deemed relevant to such inquiry or
investigation. The executive board shall vote to determine whether to issue a
subpoena within ten days after receipt of the request.
(2) When authorized to issue subpoenas under this section, the executive
board may require any person to provide the records or information requested
within thirty days after the request except as provided for in the subpoena or
to appear at a hearing on the date set in the subpoena.
(3) Litigation to compel or quash compliance with the authority exercised
pursuant to this section shall be advanced on the trial docket and heard and
decided by the court as quickly as possible. The court shall issue its decision
no later than twenty days after the filing of the application or petition or a
motion to quash, whichever is filed first. Either party may appeal to the Court
of Appeals within ten days after a decision is rendered.
(4) The district court of Lancaster County has jurisdiction over all
litigation arising under this section. In all such litigation, the executive
board shall provide for legal representation for the office.
(5) In case of disobedience on the part of any person to comply with any
subpoena issued pursuant to this section, the executive board shall vote on
whether to find the person in contempt or to find that the failure to comply
was not willful.
(6) If the executive board finds a person in contempt as provided in
subsection (5) of this section, the executive board may, by application or
petition to the district court of Lancaster County, request that the court
compel obedience by proceedings for contempt as in the case of disobedience of
the requirements of a subpoena issued from such court. The application or
petition shall be filed by the chairperson of the executive board.
(7) A person required to provide information under this section shall be
paid the same fees and travel allowances and shall be accorded the same
privileges and immunities as are extended to witnesses in the district courts
of this state and shall also be entitled to have counsel present while being
questioned. Any fees associated with counsel present under this section shall
not be the responsibility of the office of Public Counsel or the Legislative
Council.
Sec. 19. The Legislature finds and declares that:
(1) It is within the inherent power of the Legislature to secure needed
information in order to legislate, hold hearings, and conduct investigations of
matters related to the operation of state government. This power of inquiry is
broad and indispensable;
(2) Article IV, section 23, of the Constitution of Nebraska specifically
provides that the Legislature may at any time require that information be
provided to it from the officers and employees of state agencies relating to
the condition, management, and expenses of their respective offices; and
(3) In order to assist the members of the Legislature in exercising their
inherent, constitutional, and statutory authority to conduct investigations and
provide oversight of the various agencies, branches, departments, boards,
bureaus, commissions, councils, subunits, and committees of Nebraska state
government, and to assist in the development of legislation to improve and
enhance the operation of state government, the Legislature created the Division
of Legislative Oversight.
Sec. 20. (1) The Division of Legislative Oversight is established within
the Legislative Council. The division shall be responsible for conducting
assessments, investigations, audits, inspections, and other reviews of Nebraska
state government to ensure the Legislature is able to carry out its
responsibilities to secure needed information to legislate and appropriate. The
Director of Legislative Oversight shall be responsible for hiring, firing, and
-5-

LB298 LB298
2025 2025
supervising division staff.
(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the Division of
Legislative Oversight shall have access to confidential information and
confidential records necessary to carry out its responsibilities.
(3) Except as otherwise provided by law, any confidential information or
confidential records shared with the Division of Legislative Oversight shall
remain confidential and shall not be shared by an employee of the division with
any person who is not an employee of the division, including any member of the
Legislative Oversight Committee.
(4) The Division of Legislative Oversight and the office of Public Counsel
may share confidential information as necessary to carry out the
responsibilities of such division and office. Such sharing of confidential
information shall include, but not be limited to, the sharing of confidential
information when necessary to refer complaints between such division and office
and to assist in investigations and the resolution of complaints. The Division
of Legislative Oversight and the office of Public Counsel, at the discretion of
the Director of Legislative Oversight and the Public Counsel, may coordinate to
work jointly on complaints and investigations in circumstances of overlapping
jurisdiction.
(5) If any employee of the Division of Legislative Oversight knowingly
divulges or makes known, in any manner not permitted by law, confidential
information or confidential records, it shall be grounds for dismissal.
Sec. 21. (1) The Director of Legislative Oversight shall be appointed by
the Legislature, with the vote of two-thirds of the members required for
approval of such appointment, from nominations submitted by the Legislative
Oversight Committee. The director shall serve for a term of six years, unless
removed by a two-thirds vote of the members of the Legislature or, if the
Legislature is not in session, by a two-thirds vote of the members of the
Legislative Council. If the office of Director of Legislative Oversight becomes
vacant for any reason, the chairperson of the Executive Board of the
Legislative Council shall appoint an acting director until a successor Director
of Legislative Oversight is appointed. The director shall be selected without
regard to political affiliation and on the basis of integrity, capability for
strong leadership, commitment to government oversight, and demonstrated ability
in accounting, auditing, financial analysis, law, management analysis, public
administration, investigation, or criminal justice administration or other
closely related fields. No person may serve as director within two years after
the last day on which such person served as a member of the Legislature or
while such person is a candidate for or holds any other state office. The
director shall receive such salary as is set by the Executive Board of the
Legislative Council.
(2) The Director of Legislative Oversight shall:
(a) Develop key performance indicators, with the approval of the
Legislative Oversight Committee, for both short-term and long-term legislative
oversight of state agencies and programs;
(b) Make recommendations to the Legislative Oversight Committee and the
Executive Board of the Legislative Council regarding the duties,
responsibilities, and activities of the division and division staff;
(c) Ensure that all assessments, investigations, audits, inspections, and
other reviews are conducted by the division without regard to special or
partisan interest and in accordance with relevant standards or guidelines; and
(d) Carry out the director's duties under the Legislative Performance
Audit Act, the Office of Inspector General of Nebraska Child Welfare Act, and
the Office of Inspector General of the Nebraska Correctional System Act.
Sec. 22. (1) The Legislative Oversight Committee is hereby established as
a special legislative committee to exercise the authority and perform the
duties provided for in the Legislative Performance Audit Act, the Office of
Inspector General of Nebraska Child Welfare Act, and the Office of Inspector
General of the Nebraska Correctional System Act. The committee shall be
composed of the Speaker of the Legislature, the chairperson of the Executive
Board of the Legislative Council, the chairperson of the Appropriations
Committee of the Legislature, the chairperson of the Judiciary Committee of the
Legislature, the chairperson of the Health and Human Services Committee of the
Legislature, and four other members of the Legislature to be chosen by the
Executive Board of the Legislature Council. The executive board shall ensure
that the Legislative Oversight Committee includes adequate geographic
representation. The chairperson and vice-chairperson of the Legislative
Oversight Committee shall be elected by a majority vote of the committee.
(2) For purposes of tax incentive performance audits authorized under the
Legislative Performance Audit Act, the committee shall also include as
nonvoting members the chairperson of the Revenue Committee of the Legislature
or his or her designee and one other member of the Revenue Committee, as
selected by the Revenue Committee.
(3) The Legislative Oversight Committee shall be subject to all rules
prescribed by the Legislature. The committee shall be reconstituted at the
beginning of each Legislature and shall meet as needed.
Sec. 23. The Legislative Oversight Committee shall:
(1) Oversee all aspects of the Division of Legislative Oversight without
regard to special or partisan interests and in accordance with relevant
standards and guidelines;
(2) Direct the work of the division through the approval of annual work
plans and by ensuring that such work is carried out in accordance with relevant
statutes;
-6-

LB298 LB298
2025 2025
(3) Approve key performance indicators for the division;
(4) Receive quarterly briefings from the Director of Legislative Oversight
or other division staff; and
(5) Carry out the committee's duties under the Legislative Performance
Audit Act, the Office of Inspector General of Nebraska Child Welfare Act, and
the Office of Inspector General of the Nebraska Correctional System Act.
Sec. 24. Section 43-4301, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
43-4301 Sections 24 to 44 of this act 43-4301 to 43-4332 shall be known
and may be cited as the Office of Inspector General of Nebraska Child Welfare
Act.
Sec. 25. The Legislature finds and declares that:
(1) It is within the inherent power of the Legislature to secure needed
information in order to legislate, hold hearings, and conduct investigations of
matters related to the operation of state government. This power of inquiry is
broad and indispensable;
(2) Article IV, section 23, of the Constitution of Nebraska specifically
provides that the Legislature may at any time require that information be
provided to it from the officers and employees of state agencies relating to
the condition, management, and expenses of their respective offices; and
(3) In order to establish a full-time program of investigation and
oversight of the Nebraska child welfare and juvenile justice systems and assist
in the development of legislation related to such systems, the Legislature
created the office of Inspector General of Nebraska Child Welfare.
Sec. 26. Section 43-4302, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
43-4302 (1) It is the intent of the Legislature that the Office of
Inspector General of Nebraska Child Welfare to:
(a) Establish a full-time program of investigation and performance review
to provide increased accountability and oversight of the Nebraska child welfare
system;
(a) (b) Assist in improving operations of the Nebraska child welfare
system;
(b) (c) Provide an independent form of inquiry for concerns regarding the
actions of individuals and agencies responsible for the care and protection of
children and youth in the Nebraska child welfare system. Confusion of the
roles, responsibilities, and accountability structures between individuals,
private contractors, branches of government, and agencies in the current system
make it difficult for the Legislature to monitor and oversee the Nebraska child
welfare system; and
(c) (d) Provide a process for investigation and review to determine if
individual complaints and issues of investigation and inquiry reveal a problem
in the child welfare system, not just individual cases, that necessitates
legislative action for improved policies and restructuring of the child welfare
system.
(2) It is not the intent of the Legislature in enacting the Office of
Inspector General of Nebraska Child Welfare Act to interfere with the duties of
the Legislative Auditor or the Legislative Fiscal Analyst or to interfere with
the statutorily defined investigative responsibilities or prerogatives of any
officer, agency, board, bureau, commission, association, society, or
institution of the executive or judicial branch of state government, except
that the act does not preclude an inquiry on the sole basis that another agency
has the same responsibility. The act shall not be construed to interfere with
or supplant the responsibilities or prerogatives of the Governor to
investigate, monitor, and report on the activities of the agencies, boards,
bureaus, commissions, associations, societies, and institutions of the
executive branch under the Governor's his or her administrative direction.
Sec. 27. Section 43-4303, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
43-4303 For purposes of the Office of Inspector General of Nebraska Child
Welfare Act: , the definitions found in sections 43-4304 to 43-4316 apply.
(1) Administrator means a person charged with administration of a program,
an office, or a division of the department or administration of a private
agency or licensed child care facility or the executive director;
(2) Child welfare system means public and private agencies and parties
that provide or effect services or supervision to system-involved children and
their families;
(3) Commission means the Nebraska Commission on Law Enforcement and
Criminal Justice;
(4) Department means the Department of Health and Human Services;
(5) Director means the chief executive officer of the department;
(6) Executive director means the executive director of the commission;
(7) Inspector General means the Inspector General of Nebraska Child
Welfare appointed under section 28 of this act;
(8) Juvenile services division means the Juvenile Services Division of the
Office of Probation Administration;
(9) Licensed child care facility means a facility or program licensed
under the Child Care Licensing Act, the Children's Residential Facilities and
Placing Licensure Act, or sections 71-1901 to 71-1906.01;
(10) Malfeasance means a wrongful act that the actor has no legal right to
do or any wrongful conduct that affects, interrupts, or interferes with
performance of an official duty;
(11) Management means supervision of subordinate employees;
-7-

LB298 LB298
2025 2025
(12) Misfeasance means the improper performance of some act that a person
may lawfully do;
(13) Obstruction means hindering an investigation, preventing an
investigation from progressing, stopping or delaying the progress of an
investigation, or making the progress of an investigation difficult or slow;
(14) Office means the office of Inspector General of Nebraska Child
Welfare and includes the Inspector General and other employees of the office;
(15) Private agency means a child welfare agency that contracts with the
department or the Office of Probation Administration or contracts to provide
services to another child welfare agency that contracts with the department or
the Office of Probation Administration;
(16) Record means any recording, in written, audio, electronic
transmission, or computer storage form, including, but not limited to, a draft,
memorandum, note, report, computer printout, notation, or message, and
includes, but is not limited to, medical records, mental health records, case
files, clinical records, financial records, and administrative records. Such
term does not include any such materials used exclusively as part of a judge's
deliberative process; and
(17) Responsible individual means a foster parent, a relative provider of
foster care, or an employee of the department, the juvenile services division,
the commission, a foster home, a private agency, a licensed child care
facility, or another provider of child welfare programs and services
responsible for the care or custody of records, documents, and files.
Sec. 28. Section 43-4317, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
43-4317 (1) The office of Inspector General of Nebraska Child Welfare is
created within the Division of Legislative Oversight office of Public Counsel
for the purpose of conducting investigations, audits, inspections, and other
oversight reviews of the Nebraska child welfare system for the Legislature. The
Inspector General shall be appointed by the Director of Legislative Oversight
Public Counsel with approval from the chairperson of the Executive Board of the
Legislative Council, the chairperson of the Legislative Oversight Committee,
and the chairperson of the Health and Human Services Committee of the
Legislature.
(2) The Inspector General shall be appointed for a term of five years and
may be reappointed. The Inspector General shall be selected without regard to
political affiliation and on the basis of integrity, capability for strong
leadership, and demonstrated ability in accounting, auditing, financial
analysis, law, management analysis, public administration, investigation, or
criminal justice administration or other closely related fields. No former or
current executive or manager of the department may be appointed Inspector
General within five years after such former or current executive's or manager's
period of service with the department. Not later than two years after the date
of appointment, the Inspector General shall obtain certification as a Certified
Inspector General by the Association of Inspectors General, its successor, or
another nationally recognized organization that provides and sponsors
educational programs and establishes professional qualifications,
certifications, and licensing for inspectors general. During the Inspector
General's his or her employment, the Inspector General shall not be actively
involved in partisan affairs.
(3) The Inspector General shall employ such investigators and support
staff as the Inspector General he or she deems necessary to carry out the
duties of the office within the amount available by appropriation through the
Division of Legislative Oversight office of Public Counsel for the office of
Inspector General of Nebraska Child Welfare. The Inspector General shall be
subject to the control and supervision of the Director of Legislative Oversight
Public Counsel, except that removal of the Inspector General shall require
approval of the chairperson of the Legislative Oversight Committee Executive
Board of the Legislative Council and the chairperson of the Health and Human
Services Committee of the Legislature. The Inspector General may also be
removed by a two-thirds majority vote of the Legislative Oversight Committee.
Sec. 29. Section 43-4318, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
43-4318 (1) The office shall investigate:
(a) Allegations or incidents of possible misconduct, misfeasance,
malfeasance, or violations of statutes or of rules or regulations of:
(i) The department by an employee of or person under contract with the
department, a private agency, a licensed child care facility, a foster parent,
or any other provider of child welfare services or which may provide a basis
for discipline pursuant to the Uniform Credentialing Act;
(ii) Subject to subsection (5) of this section, the juvenile services
division by an employee of or person under contract with the juvenile services
division, a private agency, a licensed facility, a foster parent, or any other
provider of juvenile justice services;
(iii) The commission by an employee of or person under contract with the
commission related to programs and services supported by the Nebraska County
Juvenile Services Plan Act, the Community-based Juvenile Services Aid Program,
juvenile pretrial diversion programs, or inspections of juvenile facilities;
and
(iv) A juvenile detention facility and staff secure juvenile facility by
an employee of or person under contract with such facilities;
(b) Death or serious injury in foster homes, private agencies, child care
facilities, juvenile detention facilities, staff secure juvenile facilities,
-8-

LB298 LB298
2025 2025
and other programs and facilities licensed by or under contract with the
department or the juvenile services division when the office, upon review,
determines the death or serious injury did not occur by chance; and
(c) Death or serious injury in any case in which services are provided by
the department or the juvenile services division to a child or the child's his
or her parents when the office upon review determines that the death or serious
injury did not occur by chance;
(d) Death or serious injury in or any case involving an investigation
under the Child Protection and Family Safety Act if the investigation took
place within the twelve months prior to the death or serious injury , which
case has been open for one year or less and if the office upon review
determines the death or serious injury did not occur by chance; and .
(e) Any other matter as provided in the annual work plans or key
performance indicators approved by the Legislative Oversight Committee pursuant
to section 23 of this act.
(2) The department, the juvenile services division, each juvenile
detention facility, and each staff secure juvenile facility shall report to the
office as soon as reasonably possible:
(a) All all cases of death or serious injury:
(i) Of of a child in a foster home, private agency, child care facility or
program, or other program or facility licensed by the department or inspected
through the commission;
(ii) In any case in which services are provided to a child or the child's
parents; and
(iii) Involving an investigation under the Child Protection and Family
Safety Act if the investigation took place within the twelve months prior to
the death or serious injury and upon review determines the death or serious
injury did not occur by chance; and
(b) All to the Inspector General as soon as reasonably possible after the
department or the Office of Probation Administration learns of such death or
serious injury and (b) all allegations of sexual abuse of a state ward, a
juvenile on probation, a juvenile in a detention facility, and a juvenile in a
residential child-caring agency. For purposes of this subsection, serious
injury means an injury or illness caused by suspected abuse, neglect, or
maltreatment which leaves a child in critical or serious condition.
(3)(a) The Office of Juvenile Services shall report to the office of
Inspector General of Nebraska Child Welfare as soon as reasonably possible
after any of the following instances occur at a youth rehabilitation and
treatment center:
(i) An assault;
(ii) An escape or elopement;
(iii) An attempted suicide;
(iv) Self-harm by a juvenile;
(v) Property damage not caused by normal wear and tear;
(vi) The use of mechanical restraints on a juvenile;
(vii) A significant medical event suffered by a juvenile; and
(viii) Internally substantiated violations of 34 U.S.C. 30301 et seq.
(b) The Office of Juvenile Services and the office of Inspector General of
Nebraska Child Welfare shall, if requested by either party, work in
collaboration to clarify the specific parameters to comply with subdivision (3)
(a) of this section.
(4) The department shall notify the office of Inspector General of
Nebraska Child Welfare of any leadership changes within the Office of Juvenile
Services and the youth rehabilitation and treatment centers.
(5) With respect to any investigation conducted by the Inspector General
pursuant to subdivision (1)(a) of this section that involves possible
misconduct by an employee of the juvenile services division, the Inspector
General shall immediately notify the probation administrator and provide the
information pertaining to potential personnel matters to the Office of
Probation Administration.
(6) Any investigation conducted by the Inspector General shall be
independent of and separate from an investigation pursuant to the Child
Protection and Family Safety Act. The Inspector General and his or her staff
are subject to the reporting requirements of the Child Protection and Family
Safety Act.
(7) The department shall notify the Inspector General as soon as
practicable when a criminal investigation involving a death or serious injury
required to be reported to the office under subdivision (2)(a) of this section
has commenced and when such criminal investigation has concluded.
(8) (7) Notwithstanding the fact that a criminal investigation, a criminal
prosecution, or both are in progress, all law enforcement agencies and
prosecuting attorneys may shall cooperate with any investigation conducted by
the Inspector General and may shall, immediately upon request by the Inspector
General, provide the Inspector General with copies of all law enforcement
reports which are relevant to the Inspector General's investigation. All law
enforcement reports which have been provided to the Inspector General pursuant
to this section are not public records for purposes of sections 84-712 to
84-712.09 and shall not be subject to discovery by any other person or entity.
Except to the extent that disclosure of information is otherwise provided for
in the Office of Inspector General of Nebraska Child Welfare Act, the Inspector
General shall maintain the confidentiality of all law enforcement reports
received pursuant to its request under this section. Law enforcement agencies
and prosecuting attorneys may shall, when requested by the Inspector General,
-9-

LB298 LB298
2025 2025
collaborate with the Inspector General regarding all other information relevant
to the Inspector General's investigation. The If the Inspector General in
conjunction with the Public Counsel determines it appropriate, the Inspector
General shall may, when requested to do so by a law enforcement agency or
prosecuting attorney, suspend an investigation by the office until a criminal
investigation or prosecution is completed or has proceeded to a point that, in
the judgment of the Inspector General, reinstatement of the Inspector General's
investigation will not impede or infringe upon the criminal investigation or
prosecution. Under no circumstance shall the Inspector General interview any
minor who has already been interviewed by a law enforcement agency, personnel
of the Division of Children and Family Services of the department, or staff of
a child advocacy center in connection with a relevant ongoing investigation of
a law enforcement agency.
(9) Consistent with the Nebraska Rules of Professional Conduct, counsel
for the entity under investigation shall not represent a witness. A witness may
request that counsel for the entity under investigation be present while being
questioned, but such entity shall not require a witness to make such a request.
If such a request is made, the entity under investigation shall inform the
witness that such entity's counsel does not represent the witness. For purposes
of this subsection, entity under investigation means the entity that is the
subject of an investigation under the Office of Inspector General of Nebraska
Child Welfare Act and includes the department, the juvenile services division,
the commission, a private agency, a licensed child care facility, a juvenile
detention facility, a staff secure juvenile facility, or another provider of
child welfare services or juvenile justice services.
(10) The office may conduct audits, inspections, investigations, and other
oversight as necessary to perform the duties of the office and to carry out the
purposes of the Office of Inspector General of Nebraska Child Welfare Act.
(11) For purposes of this section, serious injury means an injury or
illness caused by suspected abuse, neglect, maltreatment, self-harm, or assault
which requires urgent medical treatment.
Sec. 30. Section 43-4320, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
43-4320 (1) Complaints to the office may be made in writing. The office
shall also maintain a toll-free telephone line for complaints. A complaint
shall be evaluated to determine if it alleges possible misconduct, misfeasance,
malfeasance, or violation of a statute or of rules and regulations pursuant to
section 29 of this act 43-4318. All complaints shall be evaluated to determine
whether a full investigation is warranted.
(2) The office shall not conduct a full investigation of a complaint
unless:
(a) The complaint alleges misconduct, misfeasance, malfeasance, or
violation of a statute or of rules and regulations pursuant to section 29 of
this act 43-4318;
(b) The complaint is against a person within the jurisdiction of the
office; and
(c) The allegations can be independently verified through investigation.
(3) After receipt of a complaint, the The Inspector General shall
determine within fourteen days after receipt of a complaint whether the office
it will conduct a full investigation. A complaint alleging facts which, if
verified, would provide a basis for discipline under the Uniform Credentialing
Act shall be referred to the appropriate credentialing board under the act.
(4) When a full investigation is opened on a private agency that contracts
with the Office of Probation Administration, the Inspector General shall give
notice of such investigation to the Office of Probation Administration.
Sec. 31. Section 43-4321, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
43-4321 (1) The office shall have access to all information and personnel
necessary to perform the duties of the office and to carry out the Office of
Inspector General of Nebraska Child Welfare Act.
(2) All employees of the department, the juvenile services division as
directed by the juvenile court or the Office of Probation Administration, or
the commission, all foster parents, and all owners, operators, managers,
supervisors, and employees of private agencies, licensed child care facilities,
juvenile detention facilities, staff secure juvenile facilities, and other
providers of child welfare services or juvenile justice services shall
cooperate with the office. Cooperation includes, but is not limited to, the
following:
(a) (1) Provision of full access to and production of records and
information. Providing access to and producing records and information for the
office is not a violation of confidentiality provisions under any law, statute,
rule, or regulation if done in good faith for purposes of an investigation
under the Office of Inspector General of Nebraska Child Welfare Act;
(b) (2) Fair and honest disclosure of records and information reasonably
requested by the office pursuant to in the course of an investigation under the
act;
(c) (3) Encouraging employees to fully comply with reasonable requests of
the office pursuant to in the course of an investigation under the act;
(d) (4) Prohibition of retaliation by owners, operators, or managers
against employees for providing records or information or filing or otherwise
making a complaint to the office;
(e) (5) Not requiring employees to gain supervisory approval prior to
filing a complaint with or providing records or information to the office;
-10-

LB298 LB298
2025 2025
(f) Not requiring employees to report filing a complaint with or providing
records or information to the office; and
(g) Not requiring employees to request that counsel for the employer be
present while being questioned in the course of an investigation.
(6) Provision of complete and truthful answers to questions posed by the
office in the course of an investigation; and
(7) Not willfully interfering with or obstructing the investigation.
Sec. 32. Section 43-4322, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
43-4322 Failure to cooperate with an investigation by the office may
result in public disclosure of the failure to cooperate discipline or other
sanctions.
Sec. 33. Section 43-4323, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
43-4323 (1) At the request of the Inspector General, and after receiving
prior approval by a majority vote of the Executive Board of the Legislative
Council, the Legislative Oversight Committee may issue subpoenas in connection
with a specific inquiry or investigation undertaken pursuant to the Office of
Inspector General of Nebraska Child Welfare Act to compel the production of
records and information and sworn testimony or other evidence relevant to such
inquiry or investigation. The committee shall vote to determine whether to
issue a subpoena within ten days after receipt of the request.
(2) When authorized to issue subpoenas under this section, the committee
may require any employees of the department, the juvenile services division, or
the commission, any foster parents, or any owners, operators, managers,
supervisors, and employees of private agencies, licensed child care facilities,
juvenile detention facilities, staff secure juvenile facilities, and other
providers of child welfare services or juvenile justice services to provide the
records or information requested within thirty days after the request, except
as otherwise provided for in the subpoena, or to appear at a hearing on the
date set in the subpoena.
(3) Litigation to compel or quash compliance with the authority exercised
pursuant to this section shall be advanced on the trial docket and heard and
decided by the court as quickly as possible. The court shall issue its decision
no later than twenty days after the filing of the application or petition or a
motion to quash, whichever is filed first. Either party may appeal to the Court
of Appeals within ten days after a decision is rendered.
(4) The district court of Lancaster County has jurisdiction over all
litigation arising under this section. In all such litigation, the executive
board shall provide for legal representation for the committee.
(5) In case of disobedience on the part of any employees of the
department, the juvenile services division, or the commission, any foster
parents, or any owners, operators, managers, supervisors, and employees of
private agencies, licensed child care facilities, juvenile detention
facilities, staff secure juvenile facilities, and other providers of child
welfare services or juvenile justice services to comply with any subpoena
issued pursuant to this section, the committee shall vote on whether to find
the person in contempt or to find that the failure to comply was not willful.
(6) If the committee finds a person in contempt as provided in subsection
(5) of this section, the committee may, by application or petition to the
district court of Lancaster County, request that the court compel obedience by
proceedings for contempt as in the case of disobedience of the requirements of
a subpoena issued from such court. The application or petition shall be filed
by the chairperson of the committee.
(7) The Inspector General may issue a subpoena, enforceable by action in
an appropriate court, to compel any person to appear, give sworn testimony, or
produce documentary or other evidence deemed relevant to a matter under his or
her inquiry. A person thus required to provide information under this section
shall be paid the same fees and travel allowances and shall be accorded the
same privileges and immunities as are extended to witnesses in the district
courts of this state and shall also be entitled to have counsel present while
being questioned. Any fees associated with counsel present under this section
shall not be the responsibility of the office or the Legislative Council of
Inspector General of Nebraska Child Welfare.
Sec. 34. Section 43-4324, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
43-4324 (1) A full investigation conducted by the office shall consist of
(a) access to, and retrieval of all, relevant records through compliance with a
request of the office, by voluntary production, or by subpoena, (b) review of
all relevant records, and (c) interviews of all relevant persons In conducting
investigations, the office shall access all relevant records through subpoena,
compliance with a request of the office, and voluntary production.
(2) The office may request or request the issuance of a subpoena for any
record necessary for the investigation from the department, the juvenile
services division as permitted by law, the commission, a foster parent, a
licensed child care facility, a juvenile detention facility, a staff secure
juvenile facility, or a private agency that is pertinent to an investigation.
All case files, licensing files, medical records, financial and administrative
records, and records required to be maintained pursuant to applicable licensing
rules shall be produced for review by the office in the course of an
investigation.
(3) (2) Compliance with a request of the office includes:
(a) Production of all records requested;
-11-

LB298 LB298
2025 2025
(b) A diligent search to ensure that all appropriate records are included;
and
(c) A continuing obligation to immediately forward to the office any
relevant records received, located, or generated after the date of the
request; .
(d) Provision of complete and truthful answers to questions posed by the
office in the course of an investigation; and
(e) Not willfully interfering with or obstructing an investigation.
(4) (3) The office shall seek access in a manner that respects the dignity
and human rights of all persons involved, maintains the integrity of the
investigation, and does not unnecessarily disrupt child welfare programs or
services. When advance notice to a foster parent or to an administrator or his
or her designee is not provided, the office investigator shall, upon arrival at
the departmental or division office, bureau, or division, the private agency,
the licensed child care facility, the juvenile detention facility, the staff
secure juvenile facility, or the location of another provider of child welfare
services, request that an onsite employee notify the administrator or his or
her designee of the investigator's arrival.
(5) (4) When required by circumstances of an audit, inspection,
investigation, or other oversight require, the office may make an unannounced
visit to a foster home, a departmental or division office, bureau, or division,
a licensed child care facility, a juvenile detention facility, a staff secure
juvenile facility, a youth rehabilitation and treatment center, a private
agency, or another provider to request records relevant to an investigation.
The office may request relevant records during such visit.
(6) (5) A responsible individual or an administrator may be asked to sign
a statement of record integrity and security when a record is secured by
request as the result of a visit by the office, stating:
(a) That the responsible individual or the administrator has made a
diligent search of the departmental or division office, bureau, division,
private agency, licensed child care facility, juvenile detention facility,
staff secure juvenile facility, or other provider's location to determine that
all appropriate records in existence at the time of the request were produced;
(b) That the responsible individual or the administrator agrees to
immediately forward to the office any relevant records received, located, or
generated after the visit;
(c) The persons who have had access to the records since they were
secured; and
(d) Whether, to the best of the knowledge of the responsible individual or
the administrator, any records were removed from or added to the record since
it was secured.
(7) (6) The office shall permit a responsible individual, an
administrator, or an employee of a departmental or division office, bureau, or
division, a private agency, a licensed child care facility, a juvenile
detention facility, a staff secure juvenile facility, or another provider to
make photocopies of the original records within a reasonable time in the
presence of the office for purposes of creating a working record in a manner
that assures confidentiality.
(8) (7) The office shall present to the responsible individual or the
administrator or other employee of the departmental or division office, bureau,
or division, private agency, licensed child care facility, juvenile detention
facility, staff secure juvenile facility, or other service provider a copy of
the request, stating the date and the titles of the records received.
(9) (8) If an original record is provided during an investigation, the
office shall return the original record as soon as practical but no later than
ten business working days after the date of the compliance request.
(9) All investigations conducted by the office shall be conducted in a
manner designed to ensure the preservation of evidence for possible use in a
criminal prosecution.
Sec. 35. Section 43-4325, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
43-4325 (1) Reports of investigations conducted by the office shall not be
distributed beyond the entity that is the subject of the report without the
consent of the Inspector General.
(2) Except when a report is provided to a guardian ad litem or an attorney
in the juvenile court pursuant to subsection (2) of section 37 of this act
43-4327, the office shall redact confidential information before distributing a
report of an investigation.
(3) The office may disclose confidential information to the chairperson of
the Legislative Oversight Committee at the chairperson's request. The office
may also disclose confidential information to the chairperson of the
Legislative Oversight Committee, the chairperson of the Executive Board of the
Legislative Council, the chairperson of the Health and Human Services Committee
of the Legislature, or the chairperson of the Judiciary Committee of the
Legislature when such disclosure is, in the judgment of the Director of
Legislative Oversight Public Counsel, appropriate desirable to keep the
Legislature chairperson informed of important events, issues, and developments
in the Nebraska child welfare system.
(4) The office may also disclose such confidential information to the
Legislative Oversight Committee when such disclosure is, in the judgment of the
chairperson of the Legislative Oversight Committee, appropriate to keep the
Legislature informed of important events, issues, and developments in the
Nebraska child welfare system.
-12-

LB298 LB298
2025 2025
(5)(a) (3)(a) A summarized final report based on an investigation may be
publicly released in order to bring awareness to systemic issues.
(b) Such report shall be released only:
(i) After a disclosure is made to the appropriate chairperson of the
Legislative Oversight Committee or chairpersons pursuant to subsection (3) (2)
of this section; and
(ii) If a determination is made by the Inspector General with the
appropriate chairperson of the Legislative Oversight Committee that doing so
would be in the best interest of the public.
(c) If there is disagreement about whether releasing the report would be
in the best interest of the public, the chairperson of the Executive Board of
the Legislative Council shall may be asked to make the final decision.
(d) The Legislative Oversight Committee shall be notified prior to a
report of an investigation being publicly released under this section.
(6) (4) Records and documents, regardless of physical form, that are
obtained or produced by the office in the course of an investigation are not
public records for purposes of sections 84-712 to 84-712.09. Reports of
investigations conducted by the office are not public records for purposes of
sections 84-712 to 84-712.09.
(7) (5) The office may withhold the identity of sources of information to
protect from retaliation any person who files a complaint or provides
information in good faith pursuant to the Office of Inspector General of
Nebraska Child Welfare Act.
Sec. 36. Section 43-4326, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
43-4326 (1) The department shall provide the Director of Legislative
Oversight Public Counsel and the office Inspector General with direct computer
access to all computerized records, reports, and documents maintained by the
department in connection with administration of the Nebraska child welfare
system.
(2) The commission shall provide the office Inspector General with direct
computer access to all computerized records, reports, and documents maintained
in connection with administration of juvenile justice services.
(3) The juvenile services division, as directed by the juvenile court or
the Office of Probation Administration, shall provide the office Inspector
General with direct computer access to all computerized records, reports, and
documents maintained by the juvenile services division in connection with a
specific case under investigation.
(4) Information shall be provided in the most efficient and timely way, in
a manner that is least burdensome to the department, commission, or juvenile
services division, and in a manner which maintains the confidentiality of the
information. This may include providing information through secure electronic
access to case files and secure access to information maintained electronically
in databases and case management systems. The office, by and through the
Executive Board of the Legislative Council, may enter into information-sharing
agreements with the department, the commission, or the juvenile services
division to assist in the implementation of and compliance with the Office of
Inspector General of Nebraska Child Welfare Act.
(5)(a) The department, commission, or juvenile services division may
object to the production or disclosure of records, reports, and documents in
writing on the grounds that such records, reports, and documents are legally
privileged, identifying the specific grounds for such objection. Following such
objection, the office and the department, commission, or juvenile services
division may negotiate terms of production or disclosure pursuant to this
section.
(b) In the event that satisfactory terms of production or disclosure
cannot be reached between the office and the department, commission, or
juvenile services division, the office may request the issuance of a subpoena
pursuant to section 33 of this act.
Sec. 37. Section 43-4327, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
43-4327 (1) The Inspector General's report of an investigation shall be in
writing to the Public Counsel and may shall contain recommendations for
systemic reform. The report may recommend systemic reform or case-specific
action, including a recommendation for discharge or discipline of employees or
for sanctions against a foster parent, private agency, licensed child care
facility, or other provider of child welfare services or juvenile justice
services. All recommendations to pursue discipline shall be in writing and
signed by the Inspector General. A report of an investigation shall be
presented to the Director of Legislative Oversight and the chairperson of the
Legislative Oversight Committee. The Inspector General shall present the report
of an investigation to the director, the probation administrator, or the
executive director within three business fifteen days after the report is
presented to the Director of Legislative Oversight and the chairperson of the
Legislative Oversight Committee Public Counsel.
(2) Any person receiving a report under this section shall not further
distribute the report or any confidential information contained in the report
beyond the entity that is the subject of the report. The Inspector General,
upon notifying the Director of Legislative Oversight Public Counsel and the
director, the probation administrator, or the executive director, may
distribute the report, to the extent that it is relevant to a child's welfare,
to the guardian ad litem and attorneys in the juvenile court in which a case is
pending involving the child or family who is the subject of the report. The
-13-

LB298 LB298
2025 2025
report shall not be distributed beyond the parties except through the
appropriate court procedures to the judge.
(3) A report that identifies misconduct, misfeasance, malfeasance, or
violation of statute, rules, or regulations by an employee of the department,
the juvenile services division, the commission, a private agency, a licensed
child care facility, or another provider that is relevant to providing
appropriate supervision of an employee may be shared with the employer of such
employee. The employer shall may not further distribute the report or any
confidential information contained in the report.
Sec. 38. Section 43-4328, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
43-4328 (1) Within fifteen business days after a report is presented to
the director, the probation administrator, or the executive director under
section 37 of this act 43-4327, the director, probation administrator, or
executive director may he or she shall determine whether to accept, reject, or
request in writing modification of the recommendations contained in the report.
Any The written response shall be in writing and may include corrections of
factual errors. The Inspector General, with input from the Director of
Legislative Oversight Public Counsel, may consider any the director's,
probation administrator's, or executive director's request for modifications
but is not obligated to accept such request. Such report shall become final (a)
upon the decision of the director, the probation administrator, or the
executive director to accept or reject the recommendations in the report, (b)
within fifteen business days after or, if the director, the probation
administrator, or the executive director requests modifications , within
fifteen days after such request or after the Inspector General incorporates
such modifications, whichever occurs earlier, or (c) fifteen days after the
report is presented to the director, the probation administrator, or the
executive director if no response is received by the Inspector General. If the
Inspector General does not accept a requested modification, the recommendation
for which such modification was requested shall be considered to be rejected by
the director, probation administrator, or executive director.
(2) After the recommendations have been accepted, rejected, or modified,
the report shall be presented to the foster parent, private agency, licensed
child care facility, or other provider of child welfare services or juvenile
justice services that is the subject of the report and to persons involved in
the implementation of the recommendations in the report. Within fifteen
business thirty days after receipt of the report, the foster parent, private
agency, licensed child care facility, or other provider may submit a written
response to the office to correct any factual errors in the report and may
shall determine whether to accept, reject, or request in writing modification
of the recommendations contained in the report. The Inspector General, with
input from the Director of Legislative Oversight Public Counsel, shall consider
all materials submitted under this subsection to determine whether a corrected
report shall be issued. If the Inspector General determines that a corrected
report is necessary, the corrected report shall be issued within fifteen
business days after receipt of the written response.
(3) If the Inspector General does not issue a corrected report pursuant to
subsection (2) of this section, or if the corrected report does not address all
issues raised in the written response, the foster parent, private agency,
licensed child care facility, or other provider may request that its written
response, or portions of the response, be appended to the report or corrected
report.
(4) A report which raises issues related to credentialing under the
Uniform Credentialing Act shall be submitted to the appropriate credentialing
board under the act.
Sec. 39. Section 43-4329, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
43-4329 No report or other work product of an investigation by the
Inspector General shall be reviewable in any court. Neither the Inspector
General nor any member of the Inspector General's his or her staff shall be
required to testify or produce evidence in any judicial or administrative
proceeding concerning matters within such person's his or her official
cognizance except in a proceeding brought to enforce the Office of Inspector
General of Nebraska Child Welfare Act.
Sec. 40. Section 43-4330, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
43-4330 The Office of Inspector General of Nebraska Child Welfare Act does
not require the Inspector General to investigate all complaints. The Inspector
General, with input from the Director of Legislative Oversight Public Counsel,
shall prioritize and select investigations and inquiries that further the
intent of the act and assist in legislative oversight of the Nebraska child
welfare system and juvenile justice system. If the Inspector General determines
that the office he or she will not investigate a complaint, the Inspector
General may recommend to the parties alternative means of resolution of the
issues in the complaint.
Sec. 41. Section 43-4331, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
43-4331 On or before September 15 of each year, the Inspector General
shall provide to the Health and Human Services Committee of the Legislature,
the Judiciary Committee of the Legislature, the Supreme Court, and the Governor
a report that includes a summary of reports and investigations made under the
Office of Inspector General of Nebraska Child Welfare Act for the preceding
-14-

LB298 LB298
2025 2025
year. The report to the Legislature summary provided to the committees shall be
submitted provided electronically and filed with the Clerk of the Legislature.
The report summaries shall detail recommendations and the status of
implementation of recommendations and may also include recommendations to the
Legislature committees regarding issues discovered through investigation,
audits, inspections, and reviews by the office that will (1) increase
accountability and legislative oversight of the Nebraska child welfare system,
(2) improve operations of the department, the juvenile services division, the
commission, and the Nebraska child welfare system, or (3) deter and identify
fraud, abuse, and illegal acts. The report Such summary shall include summaries
of alternative response cases under alternative response implemented in
accordance with sections 28-710.01, 28-712, and 28-712.01 reviewed by the
Inspector General. The report summaries shall not contain any confidential or
identifying information concerning the subjects of the reports and
investigations.
Sec. 42. Section 43-4332, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
43-4332 Any person who has authority to recommend, approve, direct, or
otherwise take or affect personnel action shall not, with respect to such
authority:
(1) Take personnel action against an employee because of the disclosure of
information by the employee to the office which the employee reasonably
believes evidences wrongdoing under the Office of Inspector General of Nebraska
Child Welfare Act;
(2) Take personnel action against an employee as a reprisal for the
submission of an allegation of wrongdoing under the act to the office by such
employee; or
(3) Take personnel action against an employee as a reprisal for providing
information or testimony pursuant to actions initiated and undertaken an
investigation by the office.
Sec. 43. If the Inspector General has reason to believe that any public
officer or employee has acted in a manner that warrants criminal or
disciplinary action or proceedings, the Inspector General shall report the
matter to the department, the juvenile services division, the commission, or
other appropriate authorities.
Sec. 44. (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the office shall
have access to confidential information and confidential records necessary to
carry out its responsibilities.
(2) Except as otherwise provided by law, any confidential information or
confidential records shared with the office shall remain confidential and shall
not be shared by an employee of the office with any person who is not an
employee of the office, including any member of the Legislative Oversight
Committee.
(3) If any employee of the office knowingly divulges or makes known, in
any manner not permitted by law, confidential information or confidential
records, it shall be grounds for dismissal.
Sec. 45. Section 47-901, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
47-901 Sections 45 to 65 of this act 47-901 to 47-920 shall be known and
may be cited as the Office of Inspector General of the Nebraska Correctional
System Act.
Sec. 46. The Legislature finds and declares that:
(1) It is within the inherent power of the Legislature to secure needed
information in order to legislate, hold hearings, and conduct investigations of
matters related to the operation of state government. This power of inquiry is
broad and indispensable;
(2) Article IV, section 19, of the Constitution of Nebraska specifically
provides that the general management, control, and government of all state
reformatory and penal institutions shall be vested as determined by the
Legislature;
(3) Article IV, section 23, of the Constitution of Nebraska specifically
provides that the Legislature may at any time require that information be
provided to it from the officers and employees of state agencies relating to
the condition, management, and expenses of their respective offices; and
(4) In order to establish a full-time program of investigation and
oversight of the Nebraska correctional system and assist in the development of
legislation related to the Nebraska correctional system, the Legislature
created the office of Inspector General of the Nebraska Correctional System.
Sec. 47. Section 47-902, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
47-902 (1) It is the intent of the Legislature that the office of
Inspector General of the Nebraska Correctional System to:
(a) Establish a full-time program of investigation and performance review
to provide increased accountability and oversight of the Nebraska correctional
system;
(a) (b) Assist in improving operations of the department and the Nebraska
correctional system;
(b) (c) Provide an independent form of inquiry for concerns regarding the
actions of individuals and agencies responsible for the supervision and release
of persons in the Nebraska correctional system. A lack of responsibility and
accountability between individuals and private agencies in the current system
makes make it difficult for the Legislature to monitor and oversee the Nebraska
correctional system; and
-15-

LB298 LB298
2025 2025
(c) (d) Provide a process for investigation and review in order to improve
policies and procedures of the correctional system.
(2) It is not the intent of the Legislature in enacting the Office of
Inspector General of the Nebraska Correctional System Act to interfere with the
duties of the Legislative Auditor or the Legislative Fiscal Analyst or to
interfere with the statutorily defined investigative responsibilities or
prerogatives of any officer, agency, board, bureau, commission, association,
society, or institution of the executive branch of state government, except
that the act does not preclude an inquiry on the sole basis that another agency
has the same responsibility. The act shall not be construed to interfere with
or supplant the responsibilities or prerogatives of the Governor to
investigate, monitor, and report on the activities of the agencies, boards,
bureaus, commissions, associations, societies, and institutions of the
executive branch under the Governor's his or her administrative direction.
Sec. 48. Section 47-903, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
47-903 For purposes of the Office of Inspector General of the Nebraska
Correctional System Act, the following definitions apply:
(1) Administrator means a person charged with administration of (a) a
program or , an office , or a division of the department or (b) administration
of a private agency;
(2) Department means the Department of Correctional Services;
(3) Director means the Director of Correctional Services;
(4) Division of Parole Supervision means the division created pursuant to
section 83-1,100;
(4) (5) Inspector General means the Inspector General of the Nebraska
Correctional System appointed under section 49 of this act 47-904;
(5) (6) Malfeasance means a wrongful act that the actor has no legal right
to do or any wrongful conduct that affects, interrupts, or interferes with
performance of an official duty;
(6) (7) Management means supervision of subordinate employees;
(7) (8) Misfeasance means the improper performance of some act that a
person may lawfully do;
(8) (9) Obstruction means hindering an investigation, preventing an
investigation from progressing, stopping or delaying the progress of an
investigation, or making the progress of an investigation difficult or slow;
(9) (10) Office means the office of Inspector General of the Nebraska
Correctional System and includes the Inspector General and other employees of
the office;
(10) (11) Private agency means an entity that contracts with the
department or contracts to provide services to another entity that contracts
with the department; and
(11) (12) Record means any recording in written, audio, electronic
transmission, or computer storage form, including, but not limited to, a draft,
memorandum, note, report, computer printout, notation, or message, and
includes, but is not limited to, medical record records, mental health record
records, case file files, clinical record records, financial record records,
and administrative record records.
Sec. 49. Section 47-904, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
47-904 (1) The office of Inspector General of the Nebraska Correctional
System is created within the Division of Legislative Oversight office of Public
Counsel for the purpose of conducting investigations, audits, inspections, and
other oversight reviews of the Nebraska correctional system for the
Legislature. The Inspector General shall be appointed by the Director of
Legislative Oversight Public Counsel with approval from the chairperson of the
Executive Board of the Legislative Council, the chairperson of the Legislative
Oversight Committee, and the chairperson of the Judiciary Committee of the
Legislature.
(2) The Inspector General shall be appointed for a term of five years and
may be reappointed. The Inspector General shall be selected without regard to
political affiliation and on the basis of integrity, capability for strong
leadership, and demonstrated ability in accounting, auditing, financial
analysis, law, management, public administration, investigation, or criminal
justice administration or other closely related fields. No former or current
executive or manager of the department shall be appointed Inspector General
within five years after such former or current executive's or manager's period
of service with the department. Not later than two years after the date of
appointment, the Inspector General shall obtain certification as a Certified
Inspector General by the Association of Inspectors General, its successor, or
another nationally recognized organization that provides and sponsors
educational programs and establishes professional qualifications,
certifications, and licensing for inspectors general. During the Inspector
General's his or her employment, the Inspector General shall not be actively
involved in partisan affairs.
(3) The Inspector General shall employ such investigators and support
staff as the Inspector General he or she deems necessary to carry out the
duties of the office within the amount available by appropriation through the
Division of Legislative Oversight office of Public Counsel for the office of
Inspector General of the Nebraska Correctional System. The Inspector General
shall be subject to the control and supervision of the Director of Legislative
Oversight Public Counsel, except that removal of the Inspector General shall
require approval of the chairperson of the Legislative Oversight Committee
-16-

LB298 LB298
2025 2025
Executive Board of the Legislative Council and the chairperson of the Judiciary
Committee of the Legislature. The Inspector General may also be removed by a
two-thirds majority vote of the Legislative Oversight Committee.
Sec. 50. Section 47-905, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
47-905 (1) The office shall investigate:
(a) Allegations or incidents of possible misconduct, misfeasance,
malfeasance, or violations of statutes or of rules or regulations of the
department by an employee of or a person under contract with the department or
a private agency; and
(b) Death or serious injury of individuals in the custody or under the
supervision of the department in private agencies, department correctional
facilities, and other programs and facilities licensed by or under contract
with the department. The department shall report all such cases of death or
serious injury of a person in a private agency, department correctional
facility or program, or other program or facility licensed by the department to
the Inspector General as soon as reasonably possible after the department
learns of such death or serious injury. The department shall also report all
cases of the death or serious injury of an employee when acting in such
employee's his or her capacity as an employee of the department as soon as
reasonably possible after the department learns of such death or serious
injury. The department shall also report all cases when an employee is
hospitalized in response to an injury received when such employee is acting in
such employee's his or her capacity as an employee of the department as soon as
reasonably possible after the department learns of such hospitalization. For
purposes of this subdivision, serious injury means an injury which requires
urgent and immediate medical treatment and restricts the injured person’s usual
activity; and .
(c) Any other matter as provided in the annual work plans or key
performance indicators approved by the Legislative Oversight Committee pursuant
to section 23 of this act.
(2) Any investigation conducted by the Inspector General shall be
independent of and separate from an investigation pursuant to sections 23-1821
to 23-1823.
(3) The department shall notify the Inspector General as soon as
practicable when a criminal investigation involving a death or serious injury
required to be reported to the Inspector General under subdivision (1)(b) of
this section has commenced and when such criminal investigation has concluded.
(4) (3) Notwithstanding the fact that a criminal investigation, a criminal
prosecution, or both are in progress, all law enforcement agencies and
prosecuting attorneys may shall cooperate with any investigation conducted by
the Inspector General and may, shall, immediately upon request by the Inspector
General, provide the Inspector General with copies of all law enforcement
reports which are relevant to the Inspector General's investigation. All law
enforcement reports which have been provided to the Inspector General pursuant
to this section are not public records for purposes of sections 84-712 to
84-712.09 and shall not be subject to discovery by any other person or entity.
Except to the extent that disclosure of information is otherwise provided for
in the Office of Inspector General of the Nebraska Correctional System Act, the
Inspector General shall maintain the confidentiality of all law enforcement
reports received pursuant to its request under this section. Law enforcement
agencies and prosecuting attorneys may shall, when requested by the Inspector
General, collaborate with the Inspector General regarding all other information
relevant to the Inspector General's investigation. The If the Inspector General
in conjunction with the Public Counsel determines it appropriate, the Inspector
General shall may, when requested to do so by a law enforcement agency or
prosecuting attorney, suspend an investigation by the office until a criminal
investigation or prosecution is completed or has proceeded to a point that, in
the judgment of the Inspector General, reinstatement of the Inspector General's
investigation will not impede or infringe upon the criminal investigation or
prosecution.
(5) Consistent with the Nebraska Rules of Professional Conduct, counsel
for the entity under investigation shall not represent a witness. A witness may
request that counsel for the entity under investigation be present while being
questioned, but such entity shall not require a witness to make such a request.
If such a request is made, the entity under investigation shall inform the
witness that such entity's counsel does not represent the witness. For purposes
of this subsection, entity under investigation means the entity that is the
subject of an investigation under the Office of Inspector General of the
Nebraska Correctional System Act and includes the department and a private
agency.
(6) The office may conduct audits, inspections, investigations, and other
oversight as necessary to perform the duties of the office and to carry out the
purposes of the Office of Inspector General of the Nebraska Correctional System
Act.
Sec. 51. Section 47-907, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
47-907 (1) Complaints to the office may be made in writing. A complaint
shall be evaluated to determine if it alleges possible misconduct, misfeasance,
malfeasance, or violation of a statute or of rules and regulations of the
department by an employee of or a person under contract with the department or
a private agency. All complaints shall be evaluated to determine whether a full
investigation is warranted.
-17-

LB298 LB298
2025 2025
(2) The office shall not conduct a full investigation of a complaint
unless:
(a) The complaint alleges misconduct, misfeasance, malfeasance, or
violation of a statute or of rules and regulations of the department;
(b) The complaint is against a person within the jurisdiction of the
office; and
(c) The allegations can be independently verified through investigation.
(3) After receipt of a complaint, the The Inspector General shall
determine within fourteen days after receipt of a complaint whether the office
will conduct a full investigation.
(4) When a full investigation is opened on a private agency that contracts
with the department, the Inspector General shall give notice of such
investigation to the department.
Sec. 52. Section 47-908, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
47-908 (1) The office shall have access to all information and personnel
necessary to perform the duties of the office and to carry out the Office of
Inspector General of the Nebraska Correctional System Act.
(2) All employees of the department , all employees of the Division of
Parole Supervision, and all owners, operators, managers, supervisors, and
employees of private agencies shall cooperate with the office. Cooperation
includes, but is not limited to, the following:
(a) (1) Provision of full access to and production of records and
information. Providing access to and producing records and information for the
office is not a violation of confidentiality provisions under any statute,
rule, or regulation if done in good faith for purposes of an investigation
under the Office of Inspector General of the Nebraska Correctional System Act;
(b) (2) Fair and honest disclosure of records and information reasonably
requested by the office pursuant to in the course of an investigation under the
act;
(c) (3) Encouraging employees to fully comply with reasonable requests of
the office pursuant to in the course of an investigation under the act;
(d) (4) Prohibition of retaliation by owners, operators, or managers
against employees for providing records or information or filing or otherwise
making a complaint to the office;
(e) (5) Not requiring employees to gain supervisory approval prior to
filing a complaint with or providing records or information to the office;
(f) Not requiring employees to report filing a complaint with or providing
records or information to the office; and
(g) Not requiring employees to request that counsel for the employer be
present while being questioned in the course of an investigation.
(6) Provision of complete and truthful answers to questions posed by the
office in the course of an investigation; and
(7) Not willfully interfering with or obstructing the investigation.
Sec. 53. Section 47-909, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
47-909 Failure to cooperate with an investigation by the office may result
in public disclosure of the failure to cooperate discipline or other sanctions.
Sec. 54. Section 47-910, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
47-910 (1) At the request of the Inspector General, and after receiving
prior approval by a majority vote of the Executive Board of the Legislative
Council, the Legislative Oversight Committee may issue subpoenas in connection
with a specific inquiry or investigation undertaken pursuant to the Office of
Inspector General of the Nebraska Correctional System Act to compel the
production of records and information and sworn testimony or other evidence
relevant to such inquiry or investigation. The committee shall vote to
determine whether to issue a subpoena within ten days after receipt of the
request.
(2) When authorized to issue subpoenas under this section, the committee
may require any employees of the department or any owners, operators, managers,
supervisors, and employees of private agencies to provide the records or
information requested within thirty days after the request, except as otherwise
provided for in the subpoena, or to appear at a hearing on the date set in the
subpoena.
(3) Litigation to compel or quash compliance with the authority exercised
pursuant to this section shall be advanced on the trial docket and heard and
decided by the court as quickly as possible. The court shall issue its decision
no later than twenty days after the filing of the application or petition or a
motion to quash, whichever is filed first. Either party may appeal to the Court
of Appeals within ten days after a decision is rendered.
(4) The district court of Lancaster County has jurisdiction over all
litigation arising under this section. In all such litigation, the executive
board shall provide for legal representation for the committee.
(5) In case of disobedience on the part of any employees of the department
or any owners, operators, managers, supervisors, and employees of private
agencies to comply with any subpoena issued pursuant to this section, the
committee shall vote on whether to find the person in contempt or to find that
the failure to comply was not willful.
(6) If the committee finds a person in contempt as provided in subsection
(5) of this section, the committee may, by application or petition to the
district court of Lancaster County, request that the court compel obedience by
proceedings for contempt as in the case of disobedience of the requirements of
-18-

LB298 LB298
2025 2025
a subpoena issued from such court. The application or petition shall be filed
by the chairperson of the committee.
(7) The Inspector General may issue a subpoena, enforceable by action in
an appropriate court, to compel any person to appear, give sworn testimony, or
produce documentary or other evidence deemed relevant to a matter under his or
her inquiry. A person thus required to provide information under this section
shall be paid the same fees and travel allowances and shall be accorded the
same privileges and immunities as are extended to witnesses in the district
courts of this state and shall also be entitled to have counsel present while
being questioned. Any fees associated with counsel present under this section
shall not be the responsibility of the office or the Legislative Council.
Sec. 55. Section 47-911, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
47-911 (1) A full investigation conducted by the office shall consist of
(a) access to and retrieval of all relevant records through compliance with a
request of the office, by voluntary production, or by subpoena, (b) review of
all relevant records, and (c) interviews of all relevant persons In conducting
investigations, the office shall access all relevant records through subpoena,
compliance with a request by the office, and voluntary production. The office
may request or request the issuance of a subpoena for any record necessary for
the investigation from the department or a private agency that is pertinent to
an investigation. All case files, licensing files, medical records, financial
and administrative records, and records required to be maintained pursuant to
applicable licensing rules shall be produced for review by the office in the
course of an investigation.
(2) Compliance with a request of the office includes:
(a) Production of all records requested;
(b) A diligent search to ensure that all appropriate records are included;
and
(c) A continuing obligation to immediately forward to the office any
relevant records received, located, or generated after the date of the
request; .
(d) Provision of complete and truthful answers to questions posed by the
office in the course of an investigation; and
(e) Not willfully interfering with or obstructing an investigation.
(3) The office shall seek access in a manner that respects the dignity and
human rights of all persons involved, maintains the integrity of the
investigation, and does not unnecessarily disrupt department programs or
services. When advance notice to an administrator or his or her designee is not
provided, the office investigator shall, upon arrival at the departmental
office, bureau, or division or private agency, request that an onsite employee
notify the administrator or his or her designee of the investigator's arrival.
(4) When circumstances of an audit, inspection, investigation, or review
require, the office may make an announced or unannounced visit to a
departmental office, bureau, or division, a department correctional facility,
or a private agency to request records relevant to an investigation. The office
may request relevant records during such visit.
(5) A responsible individual or an administrator may be asked to sign a
statement of record integrity and security when a record is secured by request
as the result of a visit by the office, stating:
(a) That the responsible individual or the administrator has made a
diligent search of the departmental office, bureau, division, private agency,
or department correctional facility, or private agency to determine that all
appropriate records in existence at the time of the request were produced;
(b) That the responsible individual or the administrator agrees to
immediately forward to the office any relevant records received, located, or
generated after the visit;
(c) The persons who have had access to the records since they were
secured; and
(d) Whether, to the best of the knowledge of the responsible individual or
the administrator, any records were removed from or added to the record since
it was secured.
(6) The office shall permit a responsible individual, an administrator, or
an employee of a departmental office, bureau, or division, a private agency, or
a department correctional facility, or a private agency to make photocopies of
the original records within a reasonable time in the presence of the office for
purposes of creating a working record in a manner that assures confidentiality.
(7) The office shall present to the responsible individual or the
administrator or other employee of the departmental office, bureau, or
division, private agency, or department correctional facility, or private
agency a copy of the request, stating the date and the titles of the records
received.
(8) If an original record is provided during an investigation, the office
shall return the original record as soon as practical but no later than ten
business working days after the date of the compliance request.
(9) All investigations conducted by the office shall be conducted in a
manner designed to ensure the preservation of evidence for possible use in a
criminal prosecution.
Sec. 56. Section 47-912, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
47-912 (1) Reports of investigations conducted by the office shall not be
distributed beyond the entity that is the subject of the report without the
consent of the Inspector General.
-19-

LB298 LB298
2025 2025
(2) The office shall redact confidential information before distributing a
report of an investigation.
(3) The office may disclose confidential information to the chairperson of
the Legislative Oversight Committee at the chairperson's request. The office
may also disclose confidential information to the chairperson of the
Legislative Oversight Committee, the chairperson of the Executive Board of the
Legislative Council, and the chairperson of the Judiciary Committee of the
Legislature when such disclosure is, in the judgment of the Director of
Legislative Oversight Public Counsel, appropriate desirable to keep the
Legislature chairperson informed of important events, issues, and developments
in the Nebraska correctional system.
(4) The office may also disclose such confidential information to the
Legislative Oversight Committee when such disclosure is, in the judgment of the
chairperson of the Legislative Oversight Committee, appropriate to keep the
Legislature informed of important events, issues, and developments in the
Nebraska correctional system.
(5)(a) (3)(a) A summarized final report based on an investigation may be
publicly released in order to bring awareness to systemic issues.
(b) Such report shall be released only:
(i) After a disclosure is made to the chairperson of the Legislative
Oversight Committee pursuant to subsection (3) (2) of this section; and
(ii) If a determination is made by the Inspector General with the
chairperson of the Legislative Oversight Committee that doing so would be in
the best interest of the public.
(c) If there is disagreement about whether releasing the report would be
in the best interest of the public, the chairperson of the Executive Board of
the Legislative Council shall may be asked to make the final decision.
(d) The Legislative Oversight Committee shall be notified prior to a
report of an investigation being publicly released under this section.
(6) (4) Records and documents, regardless of physical form, that are
obtained or produced by the office in the course of an investigation are not
public records for purposes of sections 84-712 to 84-712.09. Reports of
investigations conducted by the office are not public records for purposes of
sections 84-712 to 84-712.09.
(7) (5) The office may withhold the identity of sources of information to
protect from retaliation any person who files a complaint or provides
information in good faith pursuant to the Office of Inspector General of the
Nebraska Correctional System Act.
Sec. 57. Section 47-913, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
47-913 (1) The department shall provide the Director of Legislative
Oversight Public Counsel and the office Inspector General with direct computer
access to all computerized records, reports, and documents maintained by the
department in connection with administration of the Nebraska correctional
system and the Nebraska parole system. The Director of Legislative
Oversight's , except that the Public Counsel's and Inspector General's access
to an inmate's or parolee's medical or mental health records shall be subject
to the inmate's or parolee's consent unless an inmate's or parolee's death is
being investigated pursuant to subdivision (1)(b) of section 50 of this act.
(2) Information shall be provided in the most efficient and timely way, in
a manner that is least burdensome to the department, and in a manner which
maintains the confidentiality of the information. This may include providing
information through secure electronic access to case files and secure access to
information maintained electronically in databases and case management systems.
The office, by and through the Executive Board of the Legislative Council, may
enter into information-sharing agreements with the department to assist in the
implementation of and compliance with the Office of Inspector General of the
Nebraska Correctional System Act.
(3)(a) The department may object to the production or disclosure of
records, reports, and documents in writing on the grounds that such records,
reports, and documents are legally privileged, identifying the specific grounds
for such objection. Following such objection, the office and the department may
negotiate terms of production or disclosure pursuant to this section.
(b) In the event that satisfactory terms of production or disclosure
cannot be reached between the office and the department, the office may request
the issuance of a subpoena pursuant to section 54 of this act.
Sec. 58. Section 47-914, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
47-914 (1) The Inspector General's report of an investigation shall be in
writing and may to the Public Counsel and shall contain recommendations for
systemic reform. The report may recommend systemic reform or case-specific
action, including a recommendation for discharge or discipline of employees or
for sanctions against a private agency. All recommendations to pursue
discipline shall be in writing and signed by the Inspector General. A report of
an investigation shall be presented to the Director of Legislative Oversight
and the chairperson of the Legislative Oversight Committee. The Inspector
General shall present the report of an investigation to the director within
three business fifteen days after the report is presented to the Director of
Legislative Oversight and the chairperson of the Legislative Oversight
Committee Public Counsel.
(2) Any person receiving a report under this section shall not further
distribute the report or any confidential information contained in the report.
The report shall not be distributed beyond the parties except through the
-20-

LB298 LB298
2025 2025
appropriate court procedures to the judge.
(3) A report that identifies misconduct, misfeasance, malfeasance,
violation of statute, or violation of rules and regulations by an employee of
the department or a private agency that is relevant to providing appropriate
supervision of an employee may be shared with the employer of such employee.
The employer shall may not further distribute the report or any confidential
information contained in the report.
Sec. 59. Section 47-915, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
47-915 (1) Within fifteen business days after a report is presented to the
director under section 58 of this act, the director may 47-914, he or she shall
determine whether to accept, reject, or request in writing modification of the
recommendations contained in the report. Any response shall be in writing and
may include corrections of factual errors. The Inspector General, with input
from the Director of Legislative Oversight Public Counsel, may consider any the
director's request for modifications but is not obligated to accept such
request. Such report shall become final (a) upon the decision of the director
to accept or reject the recommendations in the report, (b) within fifteen
business days after or, if the director requests modifications , within fifteen
days after such request or after the Inspector General incorporates such
modifications, whichever occurs earlier, or (c) fifteen days after the report
is presented to the director if no response is made. If the Inspector General
does not accept a requested modification, the recommendation for which such
modification was requested shall be considered to be rejected by the director.
(2) Within fifteen business days after the report is presented to the
director, the report shall be presented to the private agency or other provider
of correctional services that is the subject of the report and to persons
involved in the implementation of the recommendations in the report. Within
fifteen business forty-five days after receipt of the report, the private
agency or other provider may submit a written response to the office to correct
any factual errors in the report. The Inspector General, with input from the
Director of Legislative Oversight Public Counsel, shall consider all materials
submitted under this subsection to determine whether a corrected report shall
be issued. If the Inspector General determines that a corrected report is
necessary, the corrected report shall be issued within fifteen business days
after receipt of the written response.
(3) If the Inspector General does not issue a corrected report pursuant to
subsection (2) of this section or if the corrected report does not address all
issues raised in the written response, the private agency or other provider may
request that its written response, or portions of the response, be appended to
the report or corrected report.
Sec. 60. Section 47-916, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
47-916 No report or other work product of an investigation by the
Inspector General shall be reviewable in any court. Neither the Inspector
General nor any member of the Inspector General's his or her staff shall be
required to testify or produce evidence in any judicial or administrative
proceeding concerning matters within such person's his or her official
cognizance except in a proceeding brought to enforce the Office of Inspector
General of the Nebraska Correctional System Act.
Sec. 61. Section 47-917, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
47-917 The Office of Inspector General of the Nebraska Correctional System
Act does not require the Inspector General to investigate all complaints. The
Inspector General, with input from the Director of Legislative Oversight Public
Counsel, shall prioritize and select investigations and inquiries that further
the intent of the act and assist in legislative oversight of the Nebraska
correctional system. If the Inspector General determines that the office he or
she will not investigate a complaint, the Inspector General may recommend to
the parties alternative means of resolution of the issues in the complaint.
Sec. 62. Section 47-918, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
47-918 On or before September 15 of each year, the Inspector General shall
provide to each member of the Judiciary Committee of the Legislature and , the
Governor a report that includes , and the Clerk of the Legislature a summary of
reports and investigations made under the Office of Inspector General of the
Nebraska Correctional System Act for the preceding year. The report to the
Legislature shall be submitted summary provided to the Clerk of the Legislature
shall be provided electronically and filed with the Clerk of the Legislature.
The reports summaries shall include findings and recommendations and an update
on the status of recommendations made in prior reports summaries, if any. The
findings and recommendations may address issues discovered through
investigations, audits, inspections, and reviews by the office that will (1)
increase accountability and legislative oversight of the Nebraska correctional
system, (2) improve operations of the department and the Nebraska correctional
system, (3) deter and identify fraud, abuse, and illegal acts, and (4) identify
inconsistencies between statutory requirements and requirements for
accreditation. The reports summaries shall not contain any confidential or
identifying information concerning the subjects of the reports and
investigations.
Sec. 63. Section 47-920, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
47-920 Any person who has authority to recommend, approve, direct, or
-21-

LB298 LB298
2025 2025
otherwise take or affect personnel action shall not, with respect to such
authority:
(1) Take personnel action against an employee because of the disclosure of
information by the employee to the office which the employee reasonably
believes evidences wrongdoing under the Office of Inspector General of the
Nebraska Correctional System Act;
(2) Take personnel action against an employee as a reprisal for the
submission of an allegation of wrongdoing under the act to the office by such
employee; or
(3) Take personnel action against an employee as a reprisal for providing
information or testimony pursuant to actions initiated and undertaken an
investigation by the office.
Sec. 64. If the Inspector General has reason to believe that any public
officer or employee has acted in a manner that warrants criminal or
disciplinary action or proceedings, the Inspector General shall report the
matter to the department or other appropriate authorities.
Sec. 65. (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the office shall
have access to confidential information and confidential records necessary to
carry out its responsibilities.
(2) Except as otherwise provided by law, any confidential information or
confidential records shared with the office shall remain confidential and shall
not be shared by an employee of the office with any person who is not an
employee of the office, including any member of the Legislative Oversight
Committee.
(3) If any employee of the office knowingly divulges or makes known, in
any manner not permitted by law, confidential information or confidential
records, it shall be grounds for dismissal.
Sec. 66. Section 28-711, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
28-711 (1) When any physician, any medical institution, any nurse, any
school employee, any social worker, the Inspector General appointed under
section 28 of this act 43-4317, or any other person has reasonable cause to
believe that a child has been subjected to child abuse or neglect or observes
such child being subjected to conditions or circumstances which reasonably
would result in child abuse or neglect, he or she shall report such incident or
cause a report of child abuse or neglect to be made to the proper law
enforcement agency or to the department on the toll-free number established by
subsection (2) of this section. Such report may be made orally by telephone
with the caller giving his or her name and address, shall be followed by a
written report, and to the extent available shall contain the address and age
of the abused or neglected child, the address of the person or persons having
custody of the abused or neglected child, the nature and extent of the child
abuse or neglect or the conditions and circumstances which would reasonably
result in such child abuse or neglect, any evidence of previous child abuse or
neglect including the nature and extent, and any other information which in the
opinion of the person may be helpful in establishing the cause of such child
abuse or neglect and the identity of the perpetrator or perpetrators. Law
enforcement agencies receiving any reports of child abuse or neglect under this
subsection shall notify the department pursuant to section 28-718 on the next
working day by telephone or mail.
(2) The department shall establish a statewide toll-free number to be used
by any person any hour of the day or night, any day of the week, to make
reports of child abuse or neglect. Reports of child abuse or neglect not
previously made to or by a law enforcement agency shall be made immediately to
such agency by the department.
Sec. 67. Section 28-712.01, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
is amended to read:
28-712.01 (1)(a) The department may assign a report for alternative
response consistent with the Child Protection and Family Safety Act.
(b) No report involving any of the following shall be assigned to
alternative response but shall be immediately forwarded to law enforcement or
the county attorney:
(i) Murder in the first or second degree as defined in section 28-303 or
28-304 or manslaughter as defined in section 28-305;
(ii) Assault in the first, second, or third degree or assault by
strangulation or suffocation as defined in section 28-308, 28-309, 28-310, or
28-310.01;
(iii) Sexual abuse, including acts prohibited by section 28-319,
28-319.01, 28-320, 28-320.01, 28-320.02, 28-322.01, 28-322.02, 28-322.03,
28-322.04, 28-322.05, 28-703, or 28-707;
(iv) Labor trafficking of a minor or sex trafficking of a minor as defined
in section 28-830;
(v) Neglect of a minor child that results in serious bodily injury as
defined in section 28-109, requires hospitalization of the child, or results in
an injury to the child that requires ongoing medical care, behavioral health
care, or physical or occupational therapy, including a growth delay, which may
be referred to as failure to thrive, that has been diagnosed by a physician and
is due to parental neglect;
(vi) Physical abuse to the head or torso of a child or physical abuse that
results in bodily injury;
(vii) An allegation that requires a forensic interview at a child advocacy
center or coordination with the child abuse and neglect investigation team
pursuant to section 28-728;
-22-

LB298 LB298
2025 2025
(viii) Out-of-home child abuse or neglect;
(ix) An allegation being investigated by a law enforcement agency at the
time of the assignment;
(x) A history of termination of parental rights;
(xi) Absence of a caretaker without having given an alternate caregiver
authority to make decisions and grant consents for necessary care, treatment,
and education of a child or without having made provision to be contacted to
make such decisions or grant such consents;
(xii) Domestic violence involving a caretaker in situations in which the
alleged perpetrator has access to the child or caretaker;
(xiii) A household member illegally manufactures methamphetamine or
opioids;
(xiv) A child has had contact with methamphetamine or other nonprescribed
opioids, including a positive drug screening or test; or
(xv) For a report involving an infant, a household member tests positive
for methamphetamine or nonprescribed opioids at the birth of such infant.
(c) The department may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to (i)
provide additional ineligibility criteria for assignment to alternative
response and (ii) establish additional criteria requiring review by the Review,
Evaluate, and Decide Team.
(d) A report that includes any of the following may be eligible for
alternative response but shall first be reviewed by the Review, Evaluate, and
Decide Team prior to assignment to alternative response:
(i) Domestic assault as defined in section 28-323 or domestic violence in
the family home;
(ii) Use of alcohol or controlled substances as defined in section 28-401
or 28-405 by a caregiver that impairs the caregiver's ability to care and
provide safety for the child; or
(iii) A family member residing in the home or a caregiver that has been
the subject of a report accepted for traditional response or assigned to
alternative response in the past six months.
(2) The Review, Evaluate, and Decide Team shall convene to review reports
pursuant to the department's rules, regulations, and policies, to evaluate the
information, and to determine assignment for alternative response or
traditional response. The team shall utilize consistent criteria to review the
severity of the allegation of child abuse or neglect, access to the
perpetrator, vulnerability of the child, family history including previous
reports, parental cooperation, parental or caretaker protective factors, and
other information as deemed necessary. At the conclusion of the review, the
report shall be assigned to either traditional response or alternative
response. Decisions of the team shall be made by consensus. If the team cannot
come to consensus, the report shall be assigned for a traditional response.
(3) In the case of an alternative response, the department shall complete
a comprehensive assessment. The department shall transfer the case being given
alternative response to traditional response if the department determines that
a child is unsafe or if the concern for the safety of the child is due to a
temporary living arrangement. Upon completion of the comprehensive assessment,
if it is determined that the child is safe, participation in services offered
to the family receiving an alternative response is voluntary, the case shall
not be transferred to traditional response based upon the family's failure to
enroll or participate in such services, and the subject of the report shall not
be entered into the central registry of child protection cases maintained
pursuant to section 28-718.
(4) The department shall, by the next working day after receipt of a
report of child abuse or neglect, enter into the tracking system of child
protection cases maintained pursuant to section 28-715 all reports of child
abuse or neglect received under this section that are opened for alternative
response and any action taken.
(5) The department shall make available to the appropriate investigating
law enforcement agency, child advocacy center, and county attorney a copy of
all reports relative to a case of suspected child abuse or neglect. Aggregate,
nonidentifying data regarding reports of child abuse or neglect receiving an
alternative response shall be made available quarterly to requesting agencies
outside the department. Such alternative response data shall include, but not
be limited to, the nature of the initial child abuse or neglect report, the age
of the child or children, the nature of services offered, the location of the
cases, the number of cases per month, and the number of alternative response
cases that were transferred to traditional response. Other than the office of
Inspector General of Nebraska Child Welfare, the Public Counsel, law
enforcement agency personnel, child advocacy center employees, and county
attorneys, no other agency or individual shall be provided specific,
identifying reports of child abuse or neglect being given alternative response.
The office of Inspector General of Nebraska Child Welfare shall have access to
all reports relative to cases of suspected child abuse or neglect subject to
traditional response and those subject to alternative response. The department
and the office shall develop procedures allowing for the Inspector General's
review of cases subject to alternative response. The Inspector General shall
include in the report pursuant to section 41 of this act 43-4331 a summary of
all cases reviewed pursuant to this subsection.
Sec. 68. Section 29-2011.02, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
is amended to read:
29-2011.02 Whenever a witness refuses, on the basis of the privilege
against self-incrimination, to testify or to provide other information in a
-23-

LB298 LB298
2025 2025
criminal proceeding or investigation before a court, a grand jury, the Auditor
of Public Accounts, the Legislative Council, the Legislative Oversight
Committee, or a standing committee or a special legislative investigative or
oversight committee of the Legislature, the court, on motion of the county
attorney, other prosecuting attorney, Auditor of Public Accounts, chairperson
of the Executive Board of the Legislative Council, chairperson of the
Legislative Oversight Committee, or chairperson of a standing or special
committee of the Legislature, may order the witness to testify or to provide
other information. The witness may not refuse to comply with such an order of
the court on the basis of the privilege against self-incrimination, but no
testimony or other information compelled under the court's order or any
information directly or indirectly derived from such testimony or other
information may be used against the witness in any criminal case except in a
prosecution for perjury, giving a false statement, or failing to comply with
the order of the court.
Sec. 69. Section 29-2011.03, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
is amended to read:
29-2011.03 The county attorney, other prosecuting attorney, Auditor of
Public Accounts, or chairperson of the Executive Board of the Legislative
Council, chairperson of the Legislative Oversight Committee, or chairperson of
a standing committee or a special legislative investigative or oversight
committee of the Legislature, upon an affirmative vote of a majority of the
board or committee, may request an order pursuant to section 29-2011.02 when in
such person's judgment:
(1) The testimony or other information from such individual may be
necessary to the public interest; and
(2) Such individual has refused or is likely to refuse to testify or
provide other information on the basis of the privilege against self-
incrimination.
Sec. 70. Section 43-2,108, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
is amended to read:
43-2,108 (1) The juvenile court judge shall keep a record of all
proceedings of the court in each case, including appearances, findings, orders,
decrees, and judgments, and any evidence which he or she feels it is necessary
and proper to record. The case file shall contain the complaint or petition and
subsequent pleadings. The case file may be maintained as an electronic document
through the court's electronic case management system, on microfilm, or in a
paper volume and disposed of when determined by the State Records Administrator
pursuant to the Records Management Act.
(2) Except as provided in subsections (3) and (4) of this section, the
medical, psychological, psychiatric, and social welfare reports and the records
of juvenile probation officers, as they relate to individual proceedings in the
juvenile court, shall not be open to inspection, without order of the court.
Such records shall be made available to a district court of this state or the
District Court of the United States on the order of a judge thereof for the
confidential use of such judge or his or her probation officer as to matters
pending before such court but shall not be made available to parties or their
counsel; and such district court records shall be made available to a county
court or separate juvenile court upon request of the county judge or separate
juvenile judge for the confidential use of such judge and his or her probation
officer as to matters pending before such court, but shall not be made
available by such judge to the parties or their counsel.
(3) As used in this section, confidential record information means all
docket records, other than the pleadings, orders, decrees, and judgments; case
files and records; reports and records of probation officers; and information
supplied to the court of jurisdiction in such cases by any individual or any
public or private institution, agency, facility, or clinic, which is compiled
by, produced by, and in the possession of any court. In all cases under
subdivision (3)(a) of section 43-247, access to all confidential record
information in such cases shall be granted only as follows: (a) The court of
jurisdiction may, subject to applicable federal and state regulations,
disseminate such confidential record information to any individual, or public
or private agency, institution, facility, or clinic which is providing services
directly to the juvenile and such juvenile's parents or guardian and his or her
immediate family who are the subject of such record information; (b) the court
of jurisdiction may disseminate such confidential record information, with the
consent of persons who are subjects of such information, or by order of such
court after showing of good cause, to any law enforcement agency upon such
agency's specific request for such agency's exclusive use in the investigation
of any protective service case or investigation of allegations under
subdivision (3)(a) of section 43-247, regarding the juvenile or such juvenile's
immediate family, who are the subject of such investigation; and (c) the court
of jurisdiction may disseminate such confidential record information to any
court, which has jurisdiction of the juvenile who is the subject of such
information upon such court's request.
(4) The court shall provide copies of predispositional reports and
evaluations of the juvenile to the juvenile's attorney and the county attorney
or city attorney prior to any hearing in which the report or evaluation will be
relied upon.
(5) In all cases under sections 43-246.01 and 43-247, the office of
Inspector General of Nebraska Child Welfare may submit a written request to the
probation administrator for access to the records of juvenile probation
officers in a specific case. Upon a juvenile court order, the records shall be
-24-

LB298 LB298
2025 2025
provided to the Inspector General within five days for the exclusive use in an
investigation pursuant to the Office of Inspector General of Nebraska Child
Welfare Act. Nothing in this subsection shall prevent the notification of death
or serious injury of a juvenile to the Inspector General of Nebraska Child
Welfare pursuant to section 29 of this act 43-4318 as soon as reasonably
possible after the Office of Probation Administration learns of such death or
serious injury.
(6) In all cases under sections 43-246.01 and 43-247, the juvenile court
shall disseminate confidential record information to the Foster Care Review
Office pursuant to the Foster Care Review Act.
(7) Nothing in subsections (3), (5), and (6) of this section shall be
construed to restrict the dissemination of confidential record information
between any individual or public or private agency, institute, facility, or
clinic, except any such confidential record information disseminated by the
court of jurisdiction pursuant to this section shall be for the exclusive and
private use of those to whom it was released and shall not be disseminated
further without order of such court.
(8)(a) Any records concerning a juvenile court petition filed pursuant to
subdivision (3)(c) of section 43-247 shall remain confidential except as may be
provided otherwise by law. Such records shall be accessible to (i) the juvenile
except as provided in subdivision (b) of this subsection, (ii) the juvenile's
counsel, (iii) the juvenile's parent or guardian, and (iv) persons authorized
by an order of a judge or court.
(b) Upon application by the county attorney or by the director of the
facility where the juvenile is placed and upon a showing of good cause
therefor, a judge of the juvenile court having jurisdiction over the juvenile
or of the county where the facility is located may order that the records shall
not be made available to the juvenile if, in the judgment of the court, the
availability of such records to the juvenile will adversely affect the
juvenile's mental state and the treatment thereof.
(9) Nothing in subsection (3), (5), or (6) of this section shall be
construed to restrict the immediate dissemination of a current picture and
information about a child who is missing from a foster care or out-of-home
placement. Such dissemination by the Office of Probation Administration shall
be authorized by an order of a judge or court. Such information shall be
subject to state and federal confidentiality laws and shall not include that
the child is in the care, custody, or control of the Department of Health and
Human Services or under the supervision of the Office of Probation
Administration.
(10) Any juvenile court order that places a juvenile on electronic
monitoring shall also state whether the data from such electronic monitoring
device shall be made available to a law enforcement agency immediately upon
request by such agency. For any juvenile subject to the supervision of a
probation officer, the name of the juvenile, the name of the juvenile's
probation officer, and any terms of probation included in a juvenile court
order otherwise open to inspection shall be provided to the Nebraska Commission
on Law Enforcement and Criminal Justice which shall provide access to such
information to law enforcement agencies through the state's criminal justice
information system.
Sec. 71. Section 50-401.01, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
is amended to read:
50-401.01 (1) The Legislative Council shall have an executive board, to be
known as the Executive Board of the Legislative Council, which shall consist of
a chairperson, a vice-chairperson, and six members of the Legislature, to be
chosen by the Legislature at the commencement of each regular session of the
Legislature when the speaker is chosen, and the Speaker of the Legislature. The
Legislature at large shall elect two of its members from legislative districts
Nos. 1, 17, 30, 32 to 35, 37, 38, 40 to 44, 47, and 48, two from legislative
districts Nos. 2, 3, 15, 16, 19, 21 to 29, 45, and 46, and two from legislative
districts Nos. 4 to 14, 18, 20, 31, 36, 39, and 49. The Chairperson of the
Committee on Appropriations shall serve as a nonvoting ex officio member of the
executive board whenever the board is considering fiscal administration.
(2) The executive board shall:
(a) Supervise all services and service personnel of the Legislature and
may employ and fix compensation and other terms of employment for such
personnel as may be needed to carry out the intent and activities of the
Legislature or of the board, unless otherwise directed by the Legislature,
including the adoption of policies by the executive board which permit (i) the
purchasing of an annuity for an employee who retires or (ii) the crediting of
amounts to an employee's deferred compensation account under section 84-1504.
The payments to or on behalf of an employee may be staggered to comply with
other law; and
(b) Appoint persons to fill the positions of Legislative Fiscal Analyst,
Director of Research, and Revisor of Statutes , and Legislative Auditor. The
persons appointed to these positions shall have training and experience as
determined by the executive board and shall serve at the pleasure of the
executive board. The Legislative Performance Audit Committee shall recommend
the person to be appointed Legislative Auditor. Their respective salaries shall
be set by the executive board.
(3) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the executive board may
contract to obtain legal, auditing, accounting, actuarial, or other
professional services or advice for or on behalf of the executive board, the
Legislative Council, the Legislature, or any member of the Legislature. The
-25-

LB298 LB298
2025 2025
providers of such services or advice shall meet or exceed the minimum
professional standards or requirements established or specified by their
respective professional organizations or licensing entities or by federal law.
Such contracts, the deliberations of the executive board with respect to such
contracts, and the work product resulting from such contracts shall not be
subject to review or approval by any other entity of state government.
(4) The executive board may enter into information-sharing agreements
pursuant to sections 36 and 57 of this act.
Sec. 72. Section 50-402, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
50-402 The Legislative Council shall occupy and maintain offices in the
State Capitol.
It shall be the duty of the council:
(1) To collect information concerning the government and general welfare
of the state;
(2) To examine the effects of previously enacted statutes and recommend
amendments thereto;
(3) To deal with important issues of public policy and questions of
statewide interest;
(4) To prepare a legislative program in the form of bills or otherwise as
in its opinion the welfare of the state may require, to be presented at the
next session of the Legislature;
(5) To study federal aid to the state and its political subdivisions and
advise the Legislature of money, land, or buildings available from the federal
government, matching funds necessary, grants and aids, and what new legislation
will be needed;
(6) To establish and maintain a complete and efficient bill drafting
service for the purpose of aiding and assisting members of the Legislature and
the executive departments of the state in the preparation of bills,
resolutions, and measures and in drafting the same in proper form, and for this
purpose there shall be assigned to the council for such work, rooms in the
State Capitol conveniently situated in reference to the legislative chamber;
(7) To provide, through the Revisor of Statutes, for the publication of
supplements and replacement volumes of the statutes of Nebraska;
(8) To provide, through the Division of Legislative Oversight, the office
of Inspector General for Nebraska Child Welfare, the office of Inspector
General for the Nebraska Correctional System, the Legislative Audit Office, and
any other offices or divisions established within the Legislative Council, for
both short-term and full-time oversight of matters related to the operation of
state government;
(9) (8) To provide, through the Executive Board of the Legislative
Council, for the development and maintenance of a publicly accessible, indexed,
digital Internet archive of closed-captioned video coverage of the Legislature
as provided in section 50-117; and
(10) (9) To set up subcommittees within the Legislative Council executive
board to carry out functions such as investigation of any area which the
council it may decide is in the public interest with power to employ such
additional personnel as may be needed to carry out the intent and activities of
the executive board or the Legislature.
Sec. 73. Section 50-406, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
50-406 (1) It is within the inherent power of the Legislature, including
the Legislative Council, the Legislative Oversight Committee, and any standing
committee of the Legislature, to secure needed information in order to
legislate, hold hearings, and administer oaths, as the council or committee
deems necessary, and to conduct investigations of matters within the subject
matter jurisdiction of the council or committee. This power of inquiry is broad
and indispensable.
(2) The Legislative Council may hold public hearings and may administer
oaths, issue subpoenas with the prior approval, by a majority vote, of the
Executive Board of the Legislative Council to issue subpoenas in connection
with the specific inquiry or investigation in question, compel the attendance
of witnesses and the production of any papers, books, accounts, documents, and
testimony, and cause the depositions of witnesses to be taken in the manner
prescribed by law for taking depositions in civil actions in the district
court.
(3) The Legislative Oversight Committee or a A standing committee of the
Legislature may hold public hearings, administer oaths, and gather information.
After receiving prior approval, by a majority vote, of the Executive Board of
the Legislative Council, the a standing committee may issue subpoenas to compel
the attendance of witnesses and the production of any papers, books, accounts,
documents, and testimony and cause the depositions of witnesses to be taken in
the manner prescribed by law for taking depositions in civil actions in the
district court.
(4)(a) A special legislative investigative or oversight committee may hold
public hearings, administer oaths, and gather information pursuant to a statute
or legislative resolution that provides for a specific legislative inquiry or
investigation. In the case of a resolution, such resolution shall have first
been adopted by a majority of the members of the Legislature during a
legislative session or by a majority of the members of the Executive Board of
the Legislative Council during the interim between legislative sessions.
(b) If authorized to issue subpoenas by statute or by a resolution
described in subdivision (4)(a) of this section, a special legislative
-26-

LB298 LB298
2025 2025
investigative or oversight committee may issue subpoenas to compel the
attendance of witnesses and the production of any papers, books, accounts,
documents, and testimony and cause the depositions of witnesses to be taken in
the manner prescribed by law for taking depositions in civil actions in the
district court.
(c) A resolution or statute creating a special legislative investigative
or oversight committee may prescribe limitations on the authority granted by
this section.
(5) When authorized to issue subpoenas under this section, the council or
a committee may require any state agency, political subdivision, or person to
provide information relevant to the council's or committee's work, and the
state agency, political subdivision, or person shall:
(a) Appear at a hearing on the date set in the subpoena; and
(b) Provide the information requested within thirty days after the request
except as provided for in the subpoena.
(6) Litigation to compel or quash compliance with authority exercised
pursuant to this section and section 50-407 shall be advanced on the trial
docket and heard and decided by the court as quickly as possible. The court
shall issue its decision no later than twenty days after the filing of the
application or petition or a motion to quash, whichever is filed first. Either
party may appeal to the Court of Appeals within ten days after a decision is
rendered.
(7) The district court of Lancaster County has jurisdiction over all
litigation arising under this section and section 50-407. In all such
litigation, the Executive Board of the Legislative Council shall provide for
legal representation for the council or committee.
Sec. 74. Section 50-406.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
50-406.01 (1)(a) If a member of the Legislature, the Public Counsel, the
Inspector General of Nebraska Child Welfare, the Inspector General of the
Nebraska Correctional System, or the Legislative Auditor presents a newly
constituted Legislature with a subpoena issued pursuant to section 50-406 or
section 18, 33, 54, or 94 of this act during a previous legislative biennium
and such subpoena is still pending:
(i) The Executive Board of the Legislative Council shall vote to determine
whether to renew the subpoena; and
(ii) If the subpoena was issued by the Legislative Oversight Committee or
a standing committee, such committee shall also vote to determine whether to
renew the subpoena.
(b) The vote or votes required in subdivision (1)(a) of this section shall
be taken no later than ten days after the day the regular session of the
Legislature commences as provided in Article III, section 10, of the
Constitution of Nebraska.
(c) If a majority of the members of the Executive Board of the Legislative
Council and, if applicable, of the committee, are in favor of renewing the
subpoena, the subpoena is renewed and relates back to its previous issuance and
such subpoena shall be considered to have been in full force and effect for
such entire period.
(2) The Legislature has the constitutional authority to determine the
rules of its proceedings. The question of the referencing of an investigation
or inquiry is not justiciable and cannot be challenged or invalidated in a
judicial proceeding.
Sec. 75. Section 50-407, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
50-407 (1) In case of disobedience on the part of any person, including a
representative of a state agency or political subdivision, to comply with any
subpoena issued pursuant to section 50-406 or in case of the refusal of any
witness to testify on any matters regarding which the witness may be lawfully
interrogated, the Legislative Council, the Legislative Oversight Committee, or
the standing committee or special legislative investigative or oversight
committee which issued the subpoena shall, at the hearing at which the person
was subpoenaed to appear, hold a vote on whether to find the person in contempt
or unless the council or committee votes to find that the failure to comply or
refusal to testify was not willful.
(2) If the council or committee finds a person in contempt as provided in
subsection (1) of this section, the council or committee may, by application or
petition to the district court of Lancaster County, request the court to compel
obedience by proceedings for contempt as in the case of disobedience of the
requirements of a subpoena issued from such court or a refusal to testify
therein. The application or petition shall be filed by the chairperson of the
Executive Board of the Legislative Council, and in the case of the Legislative
Oversight Committee or a standing or special legislative investigative or
oversight committee, such filing shall be joined by the chairperson of such
committee.
(3) If a witness who has been subpoenaed pursuant to section 50-406 or
section 18, 33, 54, or 94 of this act refuses to testify before the council or
a committee on the basis of the privilege against self-incrimination, a court
order may be requested pursuant to sections 29-2011.02 and 29-2011.03. In the
case of a proceeding before the Legislative Council, the request shall be filed
by the chairperson of the Executive Board of the Legislative Council. In the
case of a proceeding before the Legislative Oversight Committee, a standing
committee, or a special legislative investigative or oversight committee, the
request shall be filed by the chairperson of such committee.
-27-

LB298 LB298
2025 2025
Sec. 76. Section 50-408, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
50-408 Each witness who appears before the Legislative Council, the
Legislative Oversight Committee, any standing committee, or any special
legislative investigative or oversight committee by subpoena of such council or
committee, other than a state officer or employee, shall receive for attendance
the fees provided for witnesses in civil cases in courts of record and mileage
as provided in section 81-1176, which shall be audited and paid upon the
presentation of proper vouchers sworn to by such witness and approved by the
secretary and chairperson of the Executive Board of the Legislative Council
council.
Sec. 77. Section 50-409, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
50-409 Each officer, board, commission, or department of state government
or any local government shall make such studies for and furnish information to
the Legislative Council, including any division established within the
Legislative Council, council as the council it may require and as can be made
within the limits of its appropriation. Requests for information made under
this section shall not be subject to the procedures for public record requests
provided in sections 84-712 to 84-712.09.
Sec. 78. Section 50-410, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
50-410 The council shall meet at least once in each biennium. One meeting
of the entire council shall be held at the call of the chairperson of the
Executive Board of the Legislative Council chairman not less than thirty nor
more than sixty days prior to the next regular session of the Legislature.
Twenty-five members shall constitute a quorum, but a smaller number may meet
and may compel the attendance of members in order to secure a quorum.
Sec. 79. Section 50-416, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
50-416 (1) The office of Legislative Research Office is established within
the Legislative Council. The office shall provide nonpartisan public policy and
legal research for members of the Legislature and their staffs and maintain a
legislative reference library for the use of members of the Legislature and
their staffs. The Director of Research shall be responsible for hiring, firing,
and supervising the research office staff.
(2) At the request of the Director of Research, the Executive Board of the
Legislative Council may issue subpoenas as provided in subsection (2) of
section 50-406 for information related to a research request from the
Legislative Research Office pursuant to this section.
Sec. 80. Section 50-418, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
50-418 (1) There shall be established within the Legislative Council the
office of Legislative Fiscal Office Analyst. The Legislative Fiscal Analyst
shall be responsible for hiring, firing, and supervising the fiscal office
staff , with the approval of the Executive Board of the Legislative Council,
may employ necessary assistants.
(2) The Appropriations Committee shall determine the budgeting and related
needs of each agency of state government before and during each session of the
Legislature for the use of the Legislature. The committee, under the direction
of the Executive Board of the Legislative Council, shall secure sufficient
personnel and funds for the operation of the staff to go physically into each
agency of state government and by observation and contact be able to defend and
substantiate its recommendation and to accomplish the objective stated in this
section.
Sec. 81. Section 50-420, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
50-420 (1) Each officer, board, commission, and department of state
government, including the Accounting Administrator of the Department of
Administrative Services, shall furnish to the Legislative Fiscal Analyst, upon
request, any information in its possession, including records received from
other officers, boards, commissions, or departments of state government,
whether such information is retained in computer files or otherwise, if such
information is directly related to the performance of the official duties of
the Legislative Fiscal Analyst under sections 50-418 to 50-420.
(2) At the request of the Legislative Fiscal Analyst, and after receiving
prior approval by a majority vote of the Executive Board of the Legislative
Council, the Appropriations Committee of the Legislature may issue subpoenas as
provided in subsection (3) of section 50-406 for information related to a
request from the Legislative Fiscal Analyst pursuant to this section.
Sec. 82. Section 50-1201, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
50-1201 Sections 50-1201 to 50-1215 and section 94 of this act shall be
known and may be cited as the Legislative Performance Audit Act.
Sec. 83. Section 50-1202, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
50-1202 (1) The Legislature hereby finds and declares that pursuant to
section 50-402 it is the duty of the Legislative Council to do independent
assessments of the performance of state government organizations, programs,
activities, and functions in order to provide information to improve public
accountability and facilitate decisionmaking by parties with responsibility to
oversee or initiate corrective action.
(2) The purpose of the Legislative Performance Audit Act is to provide for
-28-

LB298 LB298
2025 2025
a system of performance audits to be conducted by the office of Legislative
Audit Office as directed by the Legislative Oversight Performance Audit
Committee.
(3) It is not the purpose of the act to interfere with the duties of the
Public Counsel or the Legislative Fiscal Analyst or to interfere with the
statutorily defined investigative responsibilities or prerogative of any
executive state officer, agency, board, bureau, commission, association,
society, or institution, except that the act shall not be construed to preclude
a performance audit of an agency on the basis that another agency has the same
responsibility. The act shall not be construed to interfere with or supplant
the responsibilities or prerogative of the Governor to monitor and report on
the performance of the agencies, boards, bureaus, commissions, associations,
societies, and institutions under his or her administrative direction.
Sec. 84. Section 50-1203, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
50-1203 For purposes of the Legislative Performance Audit Act:
(1) Agency means any department, board, commission, or other governmental
unit of the State of Nebraska acting or purporting to act by reason of
connection with the State of Nebraska, including the Office of Probation
Administration and the Office of Public Guardian, but does not include (a) any
court, (b) the Governor or his or her personal staff, (c) any political
subdivision or entity thereof, or (d) any entity of the federal government;
(2) Audit report means the report released by the committee at the
conclusion of a performance audit;
(3) (2) Auditor of Public Accounts means the Auditor of Public Accounts
whose powers and duties are prescribed in section 84-304;
(4) (3) Business day means a day on which state offices are open for
regular business;
(5) (4) Committee means the Legislative Oversight Performance Audit
Committee;
(5) Committee report means the report released by the committee at the
conclusion of a performance audit;
(6) Legislative Auditor means the Legislative Auditor appointed by the
Executive Board of the Legislative Council under section 50-1204 50-401.01;
(7) Majority vote means a vote by the majority of the committee's members;
(8) Office means the office of Legislative Audit Office;
(9) Performance audit means an objective and systematic examination of
evidence for the purpose of providing an independent assessment of the
performance of a government organization, program, activity, or function in
order to provide information to improve public accountability and facilitate
decisionmaking by parties with responsibility to oversee or initiate corrective
action. Performance audits may have a variety of objectives, including the
assessment of a program's effectiveness and results, economy and efficiency,
internal control, and compliance with legal or other requirements;
(10) Preaudit inquiry means an investigatory process during which the
office gathers and examines evidence to determine if a performance audit topic
has merit;
(11) Tax incentive performance audit means an evaluation of a tax
incentive program pursuant to section 50-1209; and
(12) Working papers means those documents containing evidence to support
the office's findings, opinions, conclusions, and judgments and includes
planning documents and the collection of evidence prepared or obtained by the
office during the performance audit or preaudit inquiry.
Sec. 85. Section 50-1204, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
50-1204 (1) The Legislative Audit Office is established within the
Division of Legislative Oversight. The office shall conduct performance audits.
The Legislative Auditor shall be appointed by the Director of Legislative
Oversight with approval from the chairperson of the Executive Board of the
Legislative Council and the chairperson of the committee. The Legislative
Auditor shall employ such performance audit and support staff as the
Legislative Auditor deems necessary to carry out the duties of the office
within the amount available by appropriation through the Division of
Legislative Oversight for the Legislative Audit Office. The Legislative Auditor
shall be subject to the control and supervision of the Director of Legislative
Oversight, except that removal of the Legislative Auditor shall require
approval of the chairperson of the committee. The Legislative Auditor may also
be removed by a two-thirds majority vote of the committee. The Legislative
Performance Audit Committee is hereby established as a special legislative
committee to exercise the authority and perform the duties provided for in the
Legislative Performance Audit Act. The committee shall be composed of the
Speaker of the Legislature, the chairperson of the Executive Board of the
Legislative Council, the chairperson of the Appropriations Committee of the
Legislature, and four other members of the Legislature to be chosen by the
Executive Board of the Legislative Council. The executive board shall ensure
that the Legislative Performance Audit Committee includes adequate geographic
representation. The chairperson and vice-chairperson of the Legislative
Performance Audit Committee shall be elected by majority vote. For purposes of
tax incentive performance audits authorized in section 50-1209, the committee
shall include as nonvoting members the chairperson of the Revenue Committee of
the Legislature or his or her designee and one other member of the Revenue
Committee, as selected by the Revenue Committee. The Legislative Performance
Audit Committee shall be subject to all rules prescribed by the Legislature.
-29-

LB298 LB298
2025 2025
The committee shall be reconstituted at the beginning of each Legislature and
shall meet as needed.
(2) The Legislative Auditor shall ensure that performance audit work
conducted by the office conforms with performance audit standards contained in
the Government Auditing Standards (2024 2018 Revision) as required in section
50-1205.01. The office shall be composed of the Legislative Auditor and other
employees of the Legislature employed to conduct performance audits. The office
shall be the custodian of all records generated by the committee or office
except as provided by section 50-1213, subsection (11) of section 77-2711, or
subdivision (10)(a) of section 77-27,119. The office shall inform the
Legislative Fiscal Analyst of its activities and consult with him or her as
needed. The office shall operate under the general direction of the Director of
Legislative Oversight and the committee.
Sec. 86. Section 50-1205, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
50-1205 The committee shall:
(1) Adopt, by majority vote, procedures consistent with the Legislative
Performance Audit Act to govern the business of the committee and the conduct
of performance audits;
(2) Ensure that performance audits undertaken done by the office committee
are not undertaken based on or influenced by special or partisan interests;
(3) Review performance audit requests and select, by majority vote,
agencies or agency programs for performance audit;
(4) Review, amend, if necessary, and approve a scope statement and an
audit plan for each performance audit;
(5) Respond to inquiries regarding performance audits;
(6) Inspect or approve the inspection of the premises, or any parts
thereof, of any agency or any property owned, leased, or operated by an agency
as frequently as is necessary in the opinion of the committee to carry out a
performance audit or preaudit inquiry;
(7) Inspect and examine, or approve the inspection and examination of, the
records and documents of any agency as a part of a performance audit or
preaudit inquiry;
(8) At the request of the Legislative Auditor, issue subpoenas,
enforceable by action in an appropriate court, to compel any person to appear,
give sworn testimony, or produce documentary or other evidence deemed relevant
to a performance audit as provided in section 94 of this act Pursuant to
section 50-406, administer oaths, issue subpoenas, compel the attendance of
witnesses and the production of any papers, books, accounts, documents, and
testimony, and cause the depositions of witnesses either residing within or
without the state to be taken in the manner prescribed by law for taking
depositions in civil actions in the district court;
(9) Review completed performance audit reports prepared by the office,
together with comments from the evaluated agency, and adopt recommendations and
incorporate them into an audit a committee report;
(10) Release audit reports the committee report to the public and
distribute them it electronically to the Clerk of the Legislature with or
without benefit of a public hearing;
(11) Hold a public hearings hearing, at the committee's discretion, for
the purpose of receiving testimony prior to issuance of audit reports the
committee report;
(12) Establish a system to ascertain and monitor an agency's
implementation of the recommendations contained in audit reports the committee
report and compliance with any statutory changes resulting from the
recommendations;
(13) Issue an annual report each September, to be prepared by the
Legislative Auditor and approved by the committee, summarizing recommendations
made pursuant to audit reports of performance audits during the previous fiscal
year and the status of implementation of those recommendations;
(14) Consult with the Director of Legislative Oversight and the
Legislative Auditor regarding the staffing and budgetary needs of the office
and assist in presenting budget requests to the Appropriations Committee of the
Legislature;
(15) Approve or reject, within the budgetary limits of the office,
contracts to retain consultants to assist with performance audits requiring
specialized knowledge or expertise. Requests for consultant contracts shall be
approved by the Legislative Auditor and presented to the committee Legislative
Performance Audit Committee by the Legislative Auditor. A majority vote shall
be required to approve consultant contract requests. For purposes of section
50-1213, subsection (11) of section 77-2711, and subsections (10) through (13)
of section 77-27,119, any consultant retained to assist with a performance
audit or preaudit inquiry shall be considered an employee of the office during
the course of the contract; and
(16) At its discretion, and with the agreement of the Auditor of Public
Accounts, conduct joint fiscal or performance audits with the Auditor of Public
Accounts. The details of any joint audit shall be agreed upon in writing by the
committee and the Auditor of Public Accounts.
Sec. 87. Section 50-1205.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
50-1205.01 (1) Except as provided in subsections (2) and (3) of this
section, performance audits done under the terms of the Legislative Performance
Audit Act shall be conducted in accordance with the generally accepted
government auditing standards for performance audits contained in the
-30-

LB298 LB298
2025 2025
Government Auditing Standards (2024 2018 Revision), published by the
Comptroller General of the United States, Government Accountability Office.
(2) Standards requiring continuing education for employees of the office
shall be met as practicable based on the availability of training funds.
(3) The frequency of the required external quality control review shall be
determined by the committee.
(4) At the beginning of each biennial legislative session, the Legislative
Auditor shall create a plan for meeting such standards and provide the plan to
the chairperson of the committee Legislative Performance Audit Committee.
Sec. 88. Section 50-1206, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
50-1206 (1) Requests for performance audits may be made by the Governor,
any other constitutional officer of the State of Nebraska, any member of the
Legislature a legislator, the Director of Legislative Oversight, the
Legislative Auditor, the Legislative Fiscal Analyst, or the Director of
Research of the Legislature.
(2) Performance audit requests shall be submitted to the committee
chairperson or Legislative Auditor by letter or on a form developed by the
Legislative Auditor.
(3) When considering a performance audit request, if the committee
determines that the request has potential merit but insufficient information is
available, it may, by majority vote, instruct the Legislative Auditor to
conduct a preaudit inquiry.
(4) Upon completion of the preaudit inquiry, the committee chairperson
shall place the request on the agenda for the committee's next meeting and
shall notify the request sponsor of that action.
(5) Tax incentive performance audits shall be initiated as provided in
section 50-1209.
Sec. 89. Section 50-1209, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
50-1209 (1) Tax incentive performance audits shall be conducted by the
office pursuant to this section on the following tax incentive programs:
(a) The Beginning Farmer Tax Credit Act;
(b) The ImagiNE Nebraska Act;
(c) The Nebraska Advantage Microenterprise Tax Credit Act;
(d) The Nebraska Advantage Research and Development Act;
(e) The Nebraska Advantage Rural Development Act;
(f) The Nebraska Job Creation and Mainstreet Revitalization Act;
(g) The New Markets Job Growth Investment Act;
(h) The Urban Redevelopment Act; and
(i) Any other tax incentive program created by the Legislature for the
purpose of recruitment or retention of businesses in Nebraska. In determining
whether a future tax incentive program is enacted for the purpose of
recruitment or retention of businesses, the office shall consider legislative
intent, including legislative statements of purpose and goals, and may also
consider whether the tax incentive program is promoted as a business incentive
by the Department of Economic Development or other relevant state agency.
(2) The office shall develop a schedule for conducting tax incentive
performance audits and shall update the schedule annually. The schedule shall
ensure that each tax incentive program is reviewed at least once every five
years.
(3) Each tax incentive performance audit conducted by the office pursuant
to this section shall include the following:
(a) If applicable, an An analysis of whether the tax incentive program is
meeting the following goals:
(i) Strengthening the state's economy overall by:
(A) Attracting new business to the state;
(B) Expanding existing businesses;
(C) Increasing employment, particularly employment of full-time workers.
The analysis shall consider whether the job growth in those businesses
receiving tax incentives is at least ten percent above industry averages;
(D) Creating high-quality jobs; and
(E) Increasing business investment;
(ii) Revitalizing rural areas and other distressed areas of the state;
(iii) Diversifying the state's economy and positioning Nebraska for the
future by stimulating entrepreneurial firms, high-tech firms, and renewable
energy firms; and
(iv) Any other program-specific goals found in the statutes for the tax
incentive program being evaluated;
(b) An analysis of the economic and fiscal impacts of the tax incentive
program. The analysis may take into account the following considerations in
addition to other relevant factors:
(i) The costs per full-time worker. When practical and applicable, such
costs shall be considered in at least the following two ways:
(A) By an estimation including the minimum investment required to qualify
for benefits; and
(B) By an estimation including all investment;
(ii) The extent to which the tax incentive changes business behavior;
(iii) The results of the tax incentive for the economy of Nebraska as a
whole. This consideration includes both direct and indirect impacts generally
and any effects on other Nebraska businesses; and
(iv) A comparison to the results of other economic development strategies
with similar goals, other policies, or other incentives;
-31-

LB298 LB298
2025 2025
(c) An assessment of whether adequate protections are in place to ensure
the fiscal impact of the tax incentive does not increase substantially beyond
the state's expectations in future years;
(d) An assessment of the fiscal impact of the tax incentive on the budgets
of local governments, if applicable; and
(e) Recommendations for any changes to statutes or rules and regulations
that would allow the tax incentive program to be more easily evaluated in the
future, including changes to data collection, reporting, sharing of
information, and clarification of goals.
(4) For purposes of this section:
(a) Distressed area means an area of substantial unemployment as
determined by the Department of Labor pursuant to the Nebraska Workforce
Innovation and Opportunity Act;
(b) Full-time worker means an individual (i) who usually works thirty-five
hours per week or more, (ii) whose employment is reported to the Department of
Labor on two consecutive quarterly wage reports, and (iii) who earns wages
equal to or exceeding the state minimum wage;
(c) High-quality job means a job that:
(i) Averages at least thirty-five hours of employment per week;
(ii) Is reported to the Department of Labor on two consecutive quarterly
wage reports; and
(iii) Earns wages that are at least ten percent higher than the statewide
industry sector average and that equal or exceed:
(A) One hundred ten percent of the Nebraska average weekly wage if the job
is in a county with a population of less than one hundred thousand inhabitants;
or
(B) One hundred twenty percent of the Nebraska average weekly wage if the
job is in a county with a population of one hundred thousand inhabitants or
more;
(d) High-tech firm means a person or unitary group that has a location
with any of the following four-digit code designations under the North American
Industry Classification System as assigned by the Department of Labor: 3341,
3342, 3344, 3345, 3364, 5112, 5182, 5191, 5413, 5415, or 5417;
(e) Nebraska average weekly wage means the most recent average weekly wage
paid by all employers in all counties in Nebraska as reported by the Department
of Labor by October 1 of each year;
(f) New business means a person or unitary group participating in a tax
incentive program that did not pay income taxes or wages in the state more than
two years prior to submitting an application under the tax incentive program.
For any tax incentive program without an application process, new business
means a person or unitary group participating in the program that did not pay
income taxes or wages in the state more than two years prior to the first day
of the first tax year for which a tax benefit was earned;
(g) Renewable energy firm means a person or unitary group that has a
location with any of the following six-digit code designations under the North
American Industry Classification System as assigned by the Department of Labor:
111110, 111150, 111199, 111930, 111991, 113310, 221111, 221113, 221114, 221115,
221116, 221117, 221118, 221121, 221122, 221330, 237130, 237990, 325193, 331511,
331512, 331513, 331523, 331524, 331529, 332111, 332112, 333511, 333611, 333612,
333613, 334519, 423830, 482111, 484230, 488510, 541360, 541370, 541620, 541690,
541714, or 541715;
(h) Rural area means any village or city of the second class in this state
or any county in this state with fewer than twenty-five thousand residents; and
(i) Unitary group has the same meaning as in section 77-2734.04.
Sec. 90. Section 50-1210, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
50-1210 (1)(a) Upon completion of a performance audit, the office shall
prepare a report of its findings and recommendations for action. Except as
provided in subdivision (b) of this subsection, the Legislative Auditor shall
provide the office's report concurrently to the committee, Director of
Legislative Oversight, agency director, and Legislative Fiscal Analyst. The
committee may, by majority vote, release the office's report or portions
thereof to other individuals, with the stipulation that the released material
shall be kept confidential.
(b) To protect taxpayer confidentiality, for tax incentive performance
audits conducted under section 50-1209, the Legislative Auditor may provide the
office’s report to the agency director up to five business days prior to
providing it to the committee, Director of Legislative Oversight, and
Legislative Fiscal Analyst.
(2) When the Legislative Auditor provides the report to the Legislative
Fiscal Analyst, the Legislative Fiscal Analyst shall issue an opinion to the
committee indicating whether the office's recommendations can be implemented by
the agency within its current appropriation.
(3) When the Legislative Auditor provides the report to the agency, the
agency shall have twenty business days from the date of receipt of the report
to provide a written response. Any written response received from the agency
shall be attached to the audit committee report. The agency shall not release
any part of the report to any person outside the agency, except that an agency
may discuss the report with the Governor. The Governor shall not release any
part of the report.
(4) Following receipt of any written response from the agency, the
Legislative Auditor shall prepare a brief written summary of the response,
including a description of any significant disagreements the agency has with
-32-

LB298 LB298
2025 2025
the office's report or recommendations.
Sec. 91. Section 50-1211, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
50-1211 (1) The committee shall review the office's report, the agency's
response, the Legislative Auditor's summary of the agency's response, and the
Legislative Fiscal Analyst's opinion prescribed in section 50-1210. The
committee may amend and shall adopt or reject each recommendation in the report
and indicate whether each recommendation can be implemented by the agency
within its current appropriation. The adopted recommendations shall be
incorporated into an audit a committee report, which shall be approved by
majority vote.
(2) The audit committee report shall include, but not be limited to, the
office's report, the agency's written response to the report, the Legislative
Auditor's summary of the agency response, the committee's recommendations, and
any opinions of the Legislative Fiscal Analyst regarding whether the
committee's recommendations can be implemented by the agency within its current
appropriation.
(3) The committee may decide, by majority vote, to defer adoption of an
audit a committee report pending a public hearing. If the committee elects to
schedule a public hearing, the committee it shall release, for review by
interested persons prior to the hearing, the office's report, the agency's
response, the Legislative Auditor's summary of the agency's response, and any
opinions of the Legislative Fiscal Analyst. The public hearing shall be held
not less than ten nor more than twenty business days following release of the
materials.
(4) When the committee elects to schedule a hearing, a summary of the
testimony received at the hearing shall be attached to the audit committee
report as an addendum. A transcript of the testimony received at the hearing
shall be on file with the committee and available for public inspection. Unless
the committee votes to delay release of the audit committee report, the report
shall be released within forty business days after the public hearing.
(5) Once the committee has approved an audit its report, the committee
shall, by majority vote, cause the audit committee report to be released to all
members of the Legislature and to the public. The report submitted to the
members of the Legislature shall be submitted electronically. The committee
may, by majority vote, release the audit committee report or portions thereof
prior to public release of the report. Each tax incentive performance audit
report may shall also be presented at a joint hearing of the Appropriations
Committee and Revenue Committee of the Legislature.
Sec. 92. Section 50-1212, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
50-1212 (1) Within forty business days following the release of the audit
committee report, the agency shall provide to the committee a written
implementation plan describing the action planned and timeframe for
accomplishment of each of the recommendations contained in the audit committee
report, except that the committee may waive such requirement for tax incentive
performance audits.
(2) The agency director shall make every effort to fully implement the
recommendations that can be implemented within the limits of the agency's
current appropriation. For those recommendations which require additional
appropriations or the drafting of legislation, the committee shall work with
the appropriate standing committee of the Legislature to ensure legislation is
introduced.
(3) The committee Legislative Performance Audit Committee shall establish
a system to ascertain and monitor agency conformity to the recommendations
contained in the audit committee report and compliance with any statutory
changes resulting from the report recommendations.
(4) Based on the tax incentive performance audit report, the Revenue
Committee of the Legislature shall electronically report its recommendation
about whether to extend the sunset date for the audited program to the
Legislature by December 1 of the year prior to such program's sunset date.
Sec. 93. Section 50-1213, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
50-1213 (1) The office shall have access to any and all information and
records, confidential or otherwise, of any agency, in whatever form they may
be, including, but not limited to, direct access to all agency databases
containing relevant program information or data, unless the office is denied
such access by federal law or explicitly named and denied such access by state
law. If such a law exists, the agency shall provide the committee with a
written explanation of its inability to produce such information and records
and, after reasonable accommodations are made, shall grant the office access to
all information and records or portions thereof that can legally be reviewed.
Accommodations that may be negotiated between the agency and the committee
include, but are not limited to, a requirement that specified information or
records be reviewed on agency premises and a requirement that specified working
papers be securely stored on agency premises.
(2) Upon receipt of a written request by the office for access to any
information or records, the agency shall provide to the office as soon as is
practicable and without delay, but not more than three business days after
actual receipt of the request, either (a) the requested materials or (b)(i) if
there is a legal basis for refusal to comply with the request, a written denial
of the request together with the information specified in subsection (1) of
this section or (ii) if the entire request cannot with reasonable good faith
-33-

LB298 LB298
2025 2025
efforts be fulfilled within three business days after actual receipt of the
request due to the significant difficulty or the extensiveness of the request,
a written explanation, including the earliest practicable date for fulfilling
the request, and an opportunity for the office to modify or prioritize the
items within the request. No delay due to the significant difficulty or the
extensiveness of a request for access to information or records shall exceed
three calendar weeks after actual receipt of such request by any agency. The
three business days shall be computed by excluding the day the request is
received, after which the designated period of time begins to run. Business day
does not include a Saturday, a Sunday, or a day during which the offices of the
custodian of the public records are closed.
(3) Except as provided in this section, any confidential information or
confidential records shared with the office shall remain confidential and shall
not be shared by an employee of the office with any person who is not an
employee of the office, including any member of the committee.
(4) Except as provided in subsection (11) of section 77-2711 and
subdivision (10)(d) of section 77-27,119, if any employee or former employee of
the office knowingly divulges or makes known, in any manner not permitted by
law, confidential information or confidential records, it shall be grounds for
dismissal he or she shall be guilty of a Class III misdemeanor and, in the case
of an employee, shall be dismissed.
(5) No proceeding of the committee or opinion or expression of any member
of the committee or office employee acting at the direction of the committee
shall be reviewable in any court. No member of the committee or office employee
acting at the direction of the committee shall be required to testify or
produce evidence in any judicial or administrative proceeding concerning
matters relating to the work of the office except in a proceeding brought to
enforce the Legislative Performance Audit Act.
(6) Pursuant to sections 84-712 and 84-712.01 and subdivision (5) of
section 84-712.05, the working papers obtained or produced by the committee or
office and correspondence between the office and an audited agency shall not be
considered public records. The committee may make the working papers available
for purposes of an external quality control review as required by generally
accepted government auditing standards. However, any reports made from such
external quality control review shall not make public any information which
would be considered confidential when in the possession of the office.
Sec. 94. (1) At the request of the Legislative Auditor, and after
receiving prior approval by a majority vote of the Executive Board of the
Legislative Council, the committee may issue subpoenas in connection with a
performance audit being conducted by the office to compel the production of
records and information and sworn testimony or other evidence relevant to such
performance audit. The committee shall vote to determine whether to issue a
subpoena within ten days after receipt of the request.
(2) When authorized to issue subpoenas under this section, the committee
may require any employees of any agency to provide the records or information
requested within thirty days after the request, except as otherwise provided
for in the subpoena, or to appear at a hearing on the date set in the subpoena.
(3) Litigation to compel or quash compliance with the authority exercised
pursuant to this section shall be advanced on the trial docket and heard and
decided by the court as quickly as possible. The court shall issue its decision
no later than twenty days after the filing of the application or petition or a
motion to quash, whichever is filed first. Either party may appeal to the Court
of Appeals within ten days after a decision is rendered.
(4) The district court of Lancaster County has jurisdiction over all
litigation arising under this section. In all such litigation, the executive
board shall provide for legal representation for the committee.
(5) In case of disobedience on the part of any employees of any agency to
comply with any subpoena issued pursuant to this section, the committee shall
vote on whether to find the person in contempt or to find that the failure to
comply was not willful.
(6) If the committee finds a person in contempt as provided in subsection
(5) of this section, the committee may, by application or petition to the
district court of Lancaster County, request that the court compel obedience by
proceedings for contempt as in the case of disobedience of the requirements of
a subpoena issued from such court. The application or petition shall be filed
by the chairperson of the committee.
(7) A person required to provide information under this section shall be
paid the same fees and travel allowances and shall be accorded the same
privileges and immunities as are extended to witnesses in the district courts
of this state and shall also be entitled to have counsel present while being
questioned. Consistent with the Nebraska Rules of Professional Conduct, counsel
for the agency that is the subject of the performance audit shall not represent
a witness. A witness may request that agency counsel be present while being
questioned, but the agency shall not require a witness to make such a request.
If such a request is made, the agency shall inform the witness that agency
counsel does not represent the witness. Any fees associated with counsel
present under this section shall not be the responsibility of the office or the
Legislative Council.
Sec. 95. Section 50-1303, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
50-1303 (1) The Government, Military and Veterans Affairs Committee of the
Legislature may randomly select and conduct an evaluation of any board,
commission, or similar entity. An evaluation conducted by the committee shall
-34-

LB298 LB298
2025 2025
include, but not be limited to, the following:
(a) A review of the basic assumptions underlying the creation of the
board, commission, or entity;
(b) A statement of the impact and effectiveness of the programs, policies,
services, or activities administered by, or under the supervision of, the
board, commission, or entity; and
(c) A recommendation as to whether the board, commission, or entity should
be terminated, continued, or modified.
(2) If the committee believes that a more extensive evaluation of a board,
commission, or entity is necessary, the chairperson of the committee, on the
committee's behalf, may request the Legislative Oversight Performance Audit
Committee to conduct a performance audit pursuant to the Legislative
Performance Audit Act. Nothing in this section shall be construed to give
requests for performance audits under this section priority over other requests
under consideration by the Legislative Oversight Performance Audit Committee.
Sec. 96. Section 50-1304, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
50-1304 (1) All agencies, boards, commissions, and departments of the
state shall furnish such information, reports, aid, services, and assistance as
may be requested by any standing committee of the Legislature in the
performance of its duties. A standing committee may issue subpoenas as provided
in subsection (3) of section 50-406 to obtain such information, reports, aid,
services, and assistance.
(2) The Government, Military and Veterans Affairs Committee of the
Legislature shall use its staff and may also request assistance from the
Director of Research of the Legislature, the Legislative Fiscal Analyst, or any
other division within the Legislature as may be necessary in the performance of
the duties set forth in sections 50-1301 to 50-1304.
Sec. 97. Section 73-401, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
73-401 Except for long-term care facilities subject to the jurisdiction of
the state long-term care ombudsman pursuant to the Long-Term Care Ombudsman
Act, the contracting agency shall ensure that any contract which a state agency
enters into or renews which agrees that a corporation, partnership, business,
firm, governmental entity, or person shall provide health and human services to
individuals or service delivery, service coordination, or case management on
behalf of the State of Nebraska shall contain a clause requiring the
corporation, partnership, business, firm, governmental entity, or person to
submit to the jurisdiction of the Public Counsel pursuant to the Office of
Public Counsel Act under sections 81-8,240 to 81-8,254 with respect to the
provision of services under the contract.
Sec. 98. Section 77-2711, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
77-2711 (1)(a) The Tax Commissioner shall enforce sections 77-2701.04 to
77-2713 and may prescribe, adopt, and enforce rules and regulations relating to
the administration and enforcement of such sections.
(b) The Tax Commissioner may prescribe the extent to which any ruling or
regulation shall be applied without retroactive effect.
(2) The Tax Commissioner may employ accountants, auditors, investigators,
assistants, and clerks necessary for the efficient administration of the
Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967 and may delegate authority to his or her
representatives to conduct hearings, prescribe regulations, or perform any
other duties imposed by such act.
(3)(a) Every seller, every retailer, and every person storing, using, or
otherwise consuming in this state property purchased from a retailer shall keep
such records, receipts, invoices, and other pertinent papers in such form as
the Tax Commissioner may reasonably require.
(b) Every such seller, retailer, or person shall keep such records for not
less than three years from the making of such records unless the Tax
Commissioner in writing sooner authorized their destruction.
(4) The Tax Commissioner or any person authorized in writing by him or her
may examine the books, papers, records, and equipment of any person selling
property and any person liable for the use tax and may investigate the
character of the business of the person in order to verify the accuracy of any
return made or, if no return is made by the person, to ascertain and determine
the amount required to be paid. In the examination of any person selling
property or of any person liable for the use tax, an inquiry shall be made as
to the accuracy of the reporting of city and county sales and use taxes for
which the person is liable under the Local Option Revenue Act or sections
13-319, 13-324, 13-2813, and 77-6403 and the accuracy of the allocation made
between the various counties, cities, villages, and municipal counties of the
tax due. The Tax Commissioner may make or cause to be made copies of resale or
exemption certificates and may pay a reasonable amount to the person having
custody of the records for providing such copies.
(5) The taxpayer shall have the right to keep or store his or her records
at a point outside this state and shall make his or her records available to
the Tax Commissioner at all times.
(6) In administration of the use tax, the Tax Commissioner may require the
filing of reports by any person or class of persons having in his, her, or
their possession or custody information relating to sales of property, the
storage, use, or other consumption of which is subject to the tax. The report
shall be filed when the Tax Commissioner requires and shall set forth the names
and addresses of purchasers of the property, the sales price of the property,
-35-

LB298 LB298
2025 2025
the date of sale, and such other information as the Tax Commissioner may
require.
(7) It shall be a Class I misdemeanor for the Tax Commissioner or any
official or employee of the Tax Commissioner, the State Treasurer, or the
Department of Administrative Services to make known in any manner whatever the
business affairs, operations, or information obtained by an investigation of
records and activities of any retailer or any other person visited or examined
in the discharge of official duty or the amount or source of income, profits,
losses, expenditures, or any particular thereof, set forth or disclosed in any
return, or to permit any return or copy thereof, or any book containing any
abstract or particulars thereof to be seen or examined by any person not
connected with the Tax Commissioner. Nothing in this section shall be construed
to prohibit (a) the delivery to a taxpayer, his or her duly authorized
representative, or his or her successors, receivers, trustees, executors,
administrators, assignees, or guarantors, if directly interested, of a
certified copy of any return or report in connection with his or her tax, (b)
the publication of statistics so classified as to prevent the identification of
particular reports or returns and the items thereof, (c) the inspection by the
Attorney General, other legal representative of the state, or county attorney
of the reports or returns of any taxpayer when either (i) information on the
reports or returns is considered by the Attorney General to be relevant to any
action or proceeding instituted by the taxpayer or against whom an action or
proceeding is being considered or has been commenced by any state agency or the
county or (ii) the taxpayer has instituted an action to review the tax based
thereon or an action or proceeding against the taxpayer for collection of tax
or failure to comply with the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967 is being considered
or has been commenced, (d) the furnishing of any information to the United
States Government or to states allowing similar privileges to the Tax
Commissioner, (e) the disclosure of information and records to a collection
agency contracting with the Tax Commissioner pursuant to sections 77-377.01 to
77-377.04, (f) the disclosure to another party to a transaction of information
and records concerning the transaction between the taxpayer and the other
party, (g) the disclosure of information pursuant to section 77-27,195,
77-5731, 77-6837, 77-6839, or 77-6928, or (h) the disclosure of information to
the Department of Labor necessary for the administration of the Employment
Security Law, the Contractor Registration Act, or the Employee Classification
Act.
(8) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (7) of this section, the
Tax Commissioner may permit the Postal Inspector of the United States Postal
Service or his or her delegates to inspect the reports or returns of any person
filed pursuant to the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967 when information on the
reports or returns is relevant to any action or proceeding instituted or being
considered by the United States Postal Service against such person for the
fraudulent use of the mails to carry and deliver false and fraudulent tax
returns to the Tax Commissioner with the intent to defraud the State of
Nebraska or to evade the payment of Nebraska state taxes.
(9) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (7) of this section, the
Tax Commissioner may permit other tax officials of this state to inspect the
tax returns, reports, and applications filed under sections 77-2701.04 to
77-2713, but such inspection shall be permitted only for purposes of enforcing
a tax law and only to the extent and under the conditions prescribed by the
rules and regulations of the Tax Commissioner.
(10) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (7) of this section, the
Tax Commissioner may, upon request, provide the county board of any county
which has exercised the authority granted by section 81-3716 with a list of the
names and addresses of the hotels located within the county for which lodging
sales tax returns have been filed or for which lodging sales taxes have been
remitted for the county's County Visitors Promotion Fund under the Nebraska
Visitors Development Act.
The information provided by the Tax Commissioner shall indicate only the
names and addresses of the hotels located within the requesting county for
which lodging sales tax returns have been filed for a specified period and the
fact that lodging sales taxes remitted by or on behalf of the hotel have
constituted a portion of the total sum remitted by the state to the county for
a specified period under the provisions of the Nebraska Visitors Development
Act. No additional information shall be revealed.
(11)(a) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (7) of this section,
the Tax Commissioner shall, upon written request by the Auditor of Public
Accounts or the office of Legislative Audit Office, make tax returns and tax
return information open to inspection by or disclosure to the Auditor of Public
Accounts or employees of the office of Legislative Audit Office for the purpose
of and to the extent necessary in making an audit of the Department of Revenue
pursuant to section 50-1205 or 84-304. Confidential tax returns and tax return
information shall be audited only upon the premises of the Department of
Revenue. All audit work papers pertaining to the audit of the Department of
Revenue shall be stored in a secure place in the Department of Revenue.
(b) No employee of the Auditor of Public Accounts or the office of
Legislative Audit Office shall disclose to any person, other than another
Auditor of Public Accounts or office employee whose official duties require
such disclosure, any return or return information described in the Nebraska
Revenue Act of 1967 in a form which can be associated with or otherwise
identify, directly or indirectly, a particular taxpayer.
(c) Any person who violates the provisions of this subsection shall be
-36-

LB298 LB298
2025 2025
guilty of a Class I misdemeanor. For purposes of this subsection, employee
includes a former Auditor of Public Accounts or office of Legislative Audit
Office employee.
(12) For purposes of this subsection and subsections (11) and (14) of this
section:
(a) Disclosure means the making known to any person in any manner a tax
return or return information;
(b) Return information means:
(i) A taxpayer's identification number and (A) the nature, source, or
amount of his or her income, payments, receipts, deductions, exemptions,
credits, assets, liabilities, net worth, tax liability, tax withheld,
deficiencies, over assessments, or tax payments, whether the taxpayer's return
was, is being, or will be examined or subject to other investigation or
processing or (B) any other data received by, recorded by, prepared by,
furnished to, or collected by the Tax Commissioner with respect to a return or
the determination of the existence or possible existence of liability or the
amount of liability of any person for any tax, penalty, interest, fine,
forfeiture, or other imposition or offense; and
(ii) Any part of any written determination or any background file document
relating to such written determination; and
(c) Tax return or return means any tax or information return or claim for
refund required by, provided for, or permitted under sections 77-2701 to
77-2713 which is filed with the Tax Commissioner by, on behalf of, or with
respect to any person and any amendment or supplement thereto, including
supporting schedules, attachments, or lists which are supplemental to or part
of the filed return.
(13) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (7) of this section, the
Tax Commissioner shall, upon request, provide any municipality which has
adopted the local option sales tax under the Local Option Revenue Act with a
list of the names and addresses of the retailers which have collected the local
option sales tax for the municipality. The request may be made annually and
shall be submitted to the Tax Commissioner on or before June 30 of each year.
The information provided by the Tax Commissioner shall indicate only the names
and addresses of the retailers. The Tax Commissioner may provide additional
information to a municipality so long as the information does not include any
data detailing the specific revenue, expenses, or operations of any particular
business.
(14)(a) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (7) of this section,
the Tax Commissioner shall, upon written request, provide an individual
certified under subdivision (b) of this subsection representing a municipality
which has adopted the local option sales and use tax under the Local Option
Revenue Act with confidential sales and use tax returns and sales and use tax
return information regarding taxpayers that possess a sales tax permit and the
amounts remitted by such permitholders at locations within the boundaries of
the requesting municipality or with confidential business use tax returns and
business use tax return information regarding taxpayers that file a Nebraska
and Local Business Use Tax Return and the amounts remitted by such taxpayers at
locations within the boundaries of the requesting municipality. Any written
request pursuant to this subsection shall provide the Department of Revenue
with no less than ten business days to prepare the sales and use tax returns
and sales and use tax return information requested. The individual certified
under subdivision (b) of this subsection shall review such returns and return
information only upon the premises of the department, except that such
limitation shall not apply if the certifying municipality has an agreement in
effect under the Nebraska Advantage Transformational Tourism and Redevelopment
Act. In such case, the individual certified under subdivision (b) of this
subsection may request that copies of such returns and return information be
sent to him or her by electronic transmission, secured in a manner as
determined by the Tax Commissioner.
(b) Each municipality that seeks to request information under subdivision
(a) of this subsection shall certify to the Department of Revenue one
individual who is authorized by such municipality to make such request and
review the documents described in subdivision (a) of this subsection. The
individual may be a municipal employee or an individual who contracts with the
requesting municipality to provide financial, accounting, or other
administrative services.
(c) No individual certified by a municipality pursuant to subdivision (b)
of this subsection shall disclose to any person any information obtained
pursuant to a review under this subsection. An individual certified by a
municipality pursuant to subdivision (b) of this subsection shall remain
subject to this subsection after he or she (i) is no longer certified or (ii)
is no longer in the employment of or under contract with the certifying
municipality.
(d) Any person who violates the provisions of this subsection shall be
guilty of a Class I misdemeanor.
(e) The Department of Revenue shall not be held liable by any person for
an impermissible disclosure by a municipality or any agent or employee thereof
of any information obtained pursuant to a review under this subsection.
(15) In all proceedings under the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967, the Tax
Commissioner may act for and on behalf of the people of the State of Nebraska.
The Tax Commissioner in his or her discretion may waive all or part of any
penalties provided by the provisions of such act or interest on delinquent
taxes specified in section 45-104.02, as such rate may from time to time be
-37-

LB298 LB298
2025 2025
adjusted.
(16)(a) The purpose of this subsection is to set forth the state's policy
for the protection of the confidentiality rights of all participants in the
system operated pursuant to the streamlined sales and use tax agreement and of
the privacy interests of consumers who deal with model 1 sellers.
(b) For purposes of this subsection:
(i) Anonymous data means information that does not identify a person;
(ii) Confidential taxpayer information means all information that is
protected under a member state's laws, regulations, and privileges; and
(iii) Personally identifiable information means information that
identifies a person.
(c) The state agrees that a fundamental precept for model 1 sellers is to
preserve the privacy of consumers by protecting their anonymity. With very
limited exceptions, a certified service provider shall perform its tax
calculation, remittance, and reporting functions without retaining the
personally identifiable information of consumers.
(d) The governing board of the member states in the streamlined sales and
use tax agreement may certify a certified service provider only if that
certified service provider certifies that:
(i) Its system has been designed and tested to ensure that the fundamental
precept of anonymity is respected;
(ii) Personally identifiable information is only used and retained to the
extent necessary for the administration of model 1 with respect to exempt
purchasers;
(iii) It provides consumers clear and conspicuous notice of its
information practices, including what information it collects, how it collects
the information, how it uses the information, how long, if at all, it retains
the information, and whether it discloses the information to member states.
Such notice shall be satisfied by a written privacy policy statement accessible
by the public on the website of the certified service provider;
(iv) Its collection, use, and retention of personally identifiable
information is limited to that required by the member states to ensure the
validity of exemptions from taxation that are claimed by reason of a consumer's
status or the intended use of the goods or services purchased; and
(v) It provides adequate technical, physical, and administrative
safeguards so as to protect personally identifiable information from
unauthorized access and disclosure.
(e) The state shall provide public notification to consumers, including
exempt purchasers, of the state's practices relating to the collection, use,
and retention of personally identifiable information.
(f) When any personally identifiable information that has been collected
and retained is no longer required for the purposes set forth in subdivision
(16)(d)(iv) of this section, such information shall no longer be retained by
the member states.
(g) When personally identifiable information regarding an individual is
retained by or on behalf of the state, it shall provide reasonable access by
such individual to his or her own information in the state's possession and a
right to correct any inaccurately recorded information.
(h) If anyone other than a member state, or a person authorized by that
state's law or the agreement, seeks to discover personally identifiable
information, the state from whom the information is sought should make a
reasonable and timely effort to notify the individual of such request.
(i) This privacy policy is subject to enforcement by the Attorney General.
(j) All other laws and regulations regarding the collection, use, and
maintenance of confidential taxpayer information remain fully applicable and
binding. Without limitation, this subsection does not enlarge or limit the
state's authority to:
(i) Conduct audits or other reviews as provided under the agreement and
state law;
(ii) Provide records pursuant to the federal Freedom of Information Act,
disclosure laws with governmental agencies, or other regulations;
(iii) Prevent, consistent with state law, disclosure of confidential
taxpayer information;
(iv) Prevent, consistent with federal law, disclosure or misuse of federal
return information obtained under a disclosure agreement with the Internal
Revenue Service; and
(v) Collect, disclose, disseminate, or otherwise use anonymous data for
governmental purposes.
Sec. 99. Section 77-27,119, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
is amended to read:
77-27,119 (1) The Tax Commissioner shall administer and enforce the income
tax imposed by sections 77-2714 to 77-27,135, and he or she is authorized to
conduct hearings, to adopt and promulgate such rules and regulations, and to
require such facts and information to be reported as he or she may deem
necessary to enforce the income tax provisions of such sections, except that
such rules, regulations, and reports shall not be inconsistent with the laws of
this state or the laws of the United States. The Tax Commissioner may for
enforcement and administrative purposes divide the state into a reasonable
number of districts in which branch offices may be maintained.
(2)(a) The Tax Commissioner may prescribe the form and contents of any
return or other document required to be filed under the income tax provisions.
Such return or other document shall be compatible as to form and content with
the return or document required by the laws of the United States. The form
-38-

LB298 LB298
2025 2025
shall have a place where the taxpayer shall designate the school district in
which he or she lives and the county in which the school district is
headquartered. The Tax Commissioner shall adopt and promulgate such rules and
regulations as may be necessary to insure compliance with this requirement.
(b) The State Department of Education, with the assistance and cooperation
of the Department of Revenue, shall develop a uniform system for numbering all
school districts in the state. Such system shall be consistent with the data
processing needs of the Department of Revenue and shall be used for the school
district identification required by subdivision (a) of this subsection.
(c) The proper filing of an income tax return shall consist of the
submission of such form as prescribed by the Tax Commissioner or an exact
facsimile thereof with sufficient information provided by the taxpayer on the
face of the form from which to compute the actual tax liability. Each taxpayer
shall include such taxpayer's correct social security number or state
identification number and the school district identification number of the
school district in which the taxpayer resides on the face of the form. A filing
is deemed to occur when the required information is provided.
(3) The Tax Commissioner, for the purpose of ascertaining the correctness
of any return or other document required to be filed under the income tax
provisions, for the purpose of determining corporate income, individual income,
and withholding tax due, or for the purpose of making an estimate of taxable
income of any person, shall have the power to examine or to cause to have
examined, by any agent or representative designated by him or her for that
purpose, any books, papers, records, or memoranda bearing upon such matters and
may by summons require the attendance of the person responsible for rendering
such return or other document or remitting any tax, or any officer or employee
of such person, or the attendance of any other person having knowledge in the
premises, and may take testimony and require proof material for his or her
information, with power to administer oaths or affirmations to such person or
persons.
(4) The time and place of examination pursuant to this section shall be
such time and place as may be fixed by the Tax Commissioner and as are
reasonable under the circumstances. In the case of a summons, the date fixed
for appearance before the Tax Commissioner shall not be less than twenty days
from the time of service of the summons.
(5) No taxpayer shall be subjected to unreasonable or unnecessary
examinations or investigations.
(6) Except in accordance with proper judicial order or as otherwise
provided by law, it shall be unlawful for the Tax Commissioner, any officer or
employee of the Tax Commissioner, any person engaged or retained by the Tax
Commissioner on an independent contract basis, any person who pursuant to this
section is permitted to inspect any report or return or to whom a copy, an
abstract, or a portion of any report or return is furnished, any employee of
the State Treasurer or the Department of Administrative Services, or any other
person to divulge, make known, or use in any manner the amount of income or any
particulars set forth or disclosed in any report or return required except for
the purpose of enforcing sections 77-2714 to 77-27,135. The officers charged
with the custody of such reports and returns shall not be required to produce
any of them or evidence of anything contained in them in any action or
proceeding in any court, except on behalf of the Tax Commissioner in an action
or proceeding under the provisions of the tax law to which he or she is a party
or on behalf of any party to any action or proceeding under such sections when
the reports or facts shown thereby are directly involved in such action or
proceeding, in either of which events the court may require the production of,
and may admit in evidence, so much of such reports or of the facts shown
thereby as are pertinent to the action or proceeding and no more. Nothing in
this section shall be construed (a) to prohibit the delivery to a taxpayer, his
or her duly authorized representative, or his or her successors, receivers,
trustees, personal representatives, administrators, assignees, or guarantors,
if directly interested, of a certified copy of any return or report in
connection with his or her tax, (b) to prohibit the publication of statistics
so classified as to prevent the identification of particular reports or returns
and the items thereof, (c) to prohibit the inspection by the Attorney General,
other legal representatives of the state, or a county attorney of the report or
return of any taxpayer who brings an action to review the tax based thereon,
against whom an action or proceeding for collection of tax has been instituted,
or against whom an action, proceeding, or prosecution for failure to comply
with the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967 is being considered or has been
commenced, (d) to prohibit furnishing to the Nebraska Workers' Compensation
Court the names, addresses, and identification numbers of employers, and such
information shall be furnished on request of the court, (e) to prohibit the
disclosure of information and records to a collection agency contracting with
the Tax Commissioner pursuant to sections 77-377.01 to 77-377.04, (f) to
prohibit the disclosure of information pursuant to section 77-27,195, 77-4110,
77-5731, 77-6521, 77-6837, 77-6839, or 77-6928, (g) to prohibit the disclosure
to the Public Employees Retirement Board of the addresses of individuals who
are members of the retirement systems administered by the board, and such
information shall be furnished to the board solely for purposes of its
administration of the retirement systems upon written request, which request
shall include the name and social security number of each individual for whom
an address is requested, (h) to prohibit the disclosure of information to the
Department of Labor necessary for the administration of the Employment Security
Law, the Contractor Registration Act, or the Employee Classification Act, (i)
-39-

LB298 LB298
2025 2025
to prohibit the disclosure to the Department of Motor Vehicles of tax return
information pertaining to individuals, corporations, and businesses determined
by the Department of Motor Vehicles to be delinquent in the payment of amounts
due under agreements pursuant to the International Fuel Tax Agreement Act, and
such disclosure shall be strictly limited to information necessary for the
administration of the act, (j) to prohibit the disclosure under section
42-358.08, 43-512.06, or 43-3327 to any court-appointed individuals, the county
attorney, any authorized attorney, or the Department of Health and Human
Services of an absent parent's address, social security number, amount of
income, health insurance information, and employer's name and address for the
exclusive purpose of establishing and collecting child, spousal, or medical
support, (k) to prohibit the disclosure of information to the Department of
Insurance, the Nebraska State Historical Society, or the State Historic
Preservation Officer as necessary to carry out the Department of Revenue's
responsibilities under the Nebraska Job Creation and Mainstreet Revitalization
Act, or (l) to prohibit the disclosure to the Department of Insurance of
information pertaining to authorization for, and use of, tax credits under the
New Markets Job Growth Investment Act. Information so obtained shall be used
for no other purpose. Any person who violates this subsection shall be guilty
of a felony and shall upon conviction thereof be fined not less than one
hundred dollars nor more than five hundred dollars, or be imprisoned not more
than five years, or be both so fined and imprisoned, in the discretion of the
court and shall be assessed the costs of prosecution. If the offender is an
officer or employee of the state, he or she shall be dismissed from office and
be ineligible to hold any public office in this state for a period of two years
thereafter.
(7) Reports and returns required to be filed under income tax provisions
of sections 77-2714 to 77-27,135 shall be preserved until the Tax Commissioner
orders them to be destroyed.
(8) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (6) of this section, the
Tax Commissioner may permit the Secretary of the Treasury of the United States
or his or her delegates or the proper officer of any state imposing an income
tax, or the authorized representative of either such officer, to inspect the
income tax returns of any taxpayer or may furnish to such officer or his or her
authorized representative an abstract of the return of income of any taxpayer
or supply him or her with information concerning an item of income contained in
any return or disclosed by the report of any investigation of the income or
return of income of any taxpayer, but such permission shall be granted only if
the statutes of the United States or of such other state, as the case may be,
grant substantially similar privileges to the Tax Commissioner of this state as
the officer charged with the administration of the income tax imposed by
sections 77-2714 to 77-27,135.
(9) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (6) of this section, the
Tax Commissioner may permit the Postal Inspector of the United States Postal
Service or his or her delegates to inspect the reports or returns of any person
filed pursuant to the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967 when information on the
reports or returns is relevant to any action or proceeding instituted or being
considered by the United States Postal Service against such person for the
fraudulent use of the mails to carry and deliver false and fraudulent tax
returns to the Tax Commissioner with the intent to defraud the State of
Nebraska or to evade the payment of Nebraska state taxes.
(10)(a) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (6) of this section,
the Tax Commissioner shall, upon written request by the Auditor of Public
Accounts or the office of Legislative Audit Office, make tax returns and tax
return information open to inspection by or disclosure to officers and
employees of the Auditor of Public Accounts or employees of the office of
Legislative Audit Office for the purpose of and to the extent necessary in
making an audit of the Department of Revenue pursuant to section 50-1205 or
84-304. The Auditor of Public Accounts or office of Legislative Audit Office
shall statistically and randomly select the tax returns and tax return
information to be audited based upon a computer tape provided by the Department
of Revenue which contains only total population documents without specific
identification of taxpayers. The Tax Commissioner shall have the authority to
approve the statistical sampling method used by the Auditor of Public Accounts
or office of Legislative Audit Office. Confidential tax returns and tax return
information shall be audited only upon the premises of the Department of
Revenue. All audit workpapers pertaining to the audit of the Department of
Revenue shall be stored in a secure place in the Department of Revenue.
(b) When selecting tax returns or tax return information for a performance
audit of a tax incentive program, the office of Legislative Audit Office shall
select the tax returns or tax return information for either all or a
statistically and randomly selected sample of taxpayers who have applied for or
who have qualified for benefits under the tax incentive program that is the
subject of the audit. When the office of Legislative Audit Office reports on
its review of tax returns and tax return information, it shall comply with
subdivision (10)(c) of this section.
(c) No officer or employee of the Auditor of Public Accounts or office of
Legislative Audit Office employee shall disclose to any person, other than
another officer or employee of the Auditor of Public Accounts or office of
Legislative Audit Office whose official duties require such disclosure, any
return or return information described in the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967 in a
form which can be associated with or otherwise identify, directly or
indirectly, a particular taxpayer.
-40-

LB298 LB298
2025 2025
(d) Any person who violates the provisions of this subsection shall be
guilty of a Class IV felony and, in the discretion of the court, may be
assessed the costs of prosecution. The guilty officer or employee shall be
dismissed from employment and be ineligible to hold any position of employment
with the State of Nebraska for a period of two years thereafter. For purposes
of this subsection, officer or employee shall include a former officer or
employee of the Auditor of Public Accounts or former employee of the office of
Legislative Audit Office.
(11) For purposes of subsections (10) through (13) of this section:
(a) Tax returns shall mean any tax or information return or claim for
refund required by, provided for, or permitted under sections 77-2714 to
77-27,135 which is filed with the Tax Commissioner by, on behalf of, or with
respect to any person and any amendment or supplement thereto, including
supporting schedules, attachments, or lists which are supplemental to or part
of the filed return;
(b) Return information shall mean:
(i) A taxpayer's identification number and (A) the nature, source, or
amount of his or her income, payments, receipts, deductions, exemptions,
credits, assets, liabilities, net worth, tax liability, tax withheld,
deficiencies, overassessments, or tax payments, whether the taxpayer's return
was, is being, or will be examined or subject to other investigation or
processing or (B) any other data received by, recorded by, prepared by,
furnished to, or collected by the Tax Commissioner with respect to a return or
the determination of the existence or possible existence of liability or the
amount of liability of any person for any tax, penalty, interest, fine,
forfeiture, or other imposition or offense; and
(ii) Any part of any written determination or any background file document
relating to such written determination; and
(c) Disclosures shall mean the making known to any person in any manner a
return or return information.
(12) The Auditor of Public Accounts shall (a) notify the Tax Commissioner
in writing thirty days prior to the beginning of an audit of his or her intent
to conduct an audit, (b) provide an audit plan, and (c) provide a list of the
tax returns and tax return information identified for inspection during the
audit. The office of Legislative Audit Office shall notify the Tax Commissioner
of the intent to conduct an audit and of the scope of the audit as provided in
section 50-1209.
(13) The Auditor of Public Accounts or the office of Legislative Audit
Office shall, as a condition for receiving tax returns and tax return
information: (a) Subject employees involved in the audit to the same
confidential information safeguards and disclosure procedures as required of
Department of Revenue employees; (b) establish and maintain a permanent system
of standardized records with respect to any request for tax returns or tax
return information, the reason for such request, and the date of such request
and any disclosure of the tax return or tax return information; (c) establish
and maintain a secure area or place in the Department of Revenue in which the
tax returns, tax return information, or audit workpapers shall be stored; (d)
restrict access to the tax returns or tax return information only to persons
whose duties or responsibilities require access; (e) provide such other
safeguards as the Tax Commissioner determines to be necessary or appropriate to
protect the confidentiality of the tax returns or tax return information; (f)
provide a report to the Tax Commissioner which describes the procedures
established and utilized by the Auditor of Public Accounts or office of
Legislative Audit Office for insuring the confidentiality of tax returns, tax
return information, and audit workpapers; and (g) upon completion of use of
such returns or tax return information, return to the Tax Commissioner such
returns or tax return information, along with any copies.
(14) The Tax Commissioner may permit other tax officials of this state to
inspect the tax returns and reports filed under sections 77-2714 to 77-27,135,
but such inspection shall be permitted only for purposes of enforcing a tax law
and only to the extent and under the conditions prescribed by the rules and
regulations of the Tax Commissioner.
(15) The Tax Commissioner shall compile the school district information
required by subsection (2) of this section. Insofar as it is possible, such
compilation shall include, but not be limited to, the total adjusted gross
income of each school district in the state. The Tax Commissioner shall adopt
and promulgate such rules and regulations as may be necessary to insure that
such compilation does not violate the confidentiality of any individual income
tax return nor conflict with any other provisions of state or federal law.
Sec. 100. Section 81-1114, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-1114 The building division shall have the following powers, duties, and
responsibilities:
(1) Shall prepare, for submittal to the Governor and to the office of the
Legislative Fiscal Analyst, analyses of the cost of every desired land and
building acquisition, new building construction, either underway or proposed,
major repair or remodeling of new, newly acquired, or existing buildings, and
each and every structural improvement to land, utilities, roads, walks, and
parking lots, costing four hundred thousand dollars or more, but excluding
right-of-way projects of the Department of Transportation. The analyses
submitted to the Legislative Fiscal Analyst shall be submitted electronically.
The Department of Administrative Services shall adjust the dollar amount in
this section every four years beginning January 1, 2002, to account for
-41-

LB298 LB298
2025 2025
inflationary and market changes. The adjustment shall be based on percentage
changes in a construction cost index and any other published index relevant to
operations and utilities costs, as selected by the department;
(2) Shall record the relationship between the proposed capital facilities
and the individual or departmental agencies' operating programs with particular
attention to needs of immediate or future operations of the department or
agency submitting such plan;
(3) Shall make recommendations to the Governor, the committee of the
Legislature which shall from time to time have responsibility for preparing
recommendations for appropriations, and the individual department or agency
concerned, on the probable costs of such acquisition, construction, repair, or
remodeling. The recommendations submitted to the committee shall be submitted
electronically; and
(4) Shall require the submission by each department and agency of the
state of copies of all written contracts for acquisition, construction, repair,
or remodeling, including federal contracts, before such contracts are executed
by the executive officer of the state authorized to execute such contracts, and
shall maintain copies of such contracts on file for inspection by the
Legislative Fiscal Analyst.
Sec. 101. Section 83-178, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
83-178 (1) The director shall establish and maintain, in accordance with
the regulations of the department, an individual file for each person committed
to the department. Each individual file shall include, when available and
appropriate, the following information on such person:
(a) Such person's His or her admission summary;
(b) Such person's His or her presentence investigation report;
(c) Such person's His or her classification report and recommendation;
(d) Official records of such person's his or her conviction and commitment
as well as any earlier criminal records;
(e) Progress reports and admission-orientation reports;
(f) Reports of any disciplinary infractions and of their disposition;
(g) Such person's His or her parole plan; and
(h) Other pertinent data concerning such person's his or her background,
conduct, associations, and family relationships.
(2) Any decision concerning the classification, reclassification, transfer
to another facility, preparole preparation, or parole release of a person
committed to the department shall be made only after such person's his or her
file has been reviewed. The content of the file shall be confidential and shall
not be subject to public inspection except by court order for good cause shown
and shall not be accessible to any person committed to the department. An
inmate may obtain access to the inmate's his or her medical records by request
to the provider pursuant to sections 71-8401 to 71-8407 notwithstanding the
fact that such medical records may be a part of the inmate's his or her
individual department file. The department retains the authority to withhold
mental health and psychological records of the inmate when appropriate.
(3) The program of each person committed to the department shall be
reviewed at regular intervals and recommendations shall be made to the chief
executive officer concerning changes in such person's program of treatment,
training, employment, care, and custody as are considered necessary or
desirable.
(4) The chief executive officer of the facility shall have final authority
to determine matters of treatment classification within such officer's his or
her facility and to recommend to the director the transfer of any person
committed to the department who is in such officer's his or her custody.
(5) The director may at any time order a person committed to the
department to undergo further examination and study for additional
recommendations concerning such person's his or her classification, custodial
control, and rehabilitative treatment.
(6) Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit in any manner the
authority of the Public Counsel or the Inspector General of the Nebraska
Correctional System to inspect and examine the records and documents of the
department pursuant to the Office of Public Counsel Act or the Office of
Inspector General of the Nebraska Correctional System Act sections 81-8,240 to
81-8,254, except that the Public Counsel's or Inspector General's access to an
inmate's medical or mental health records shall be subject to the inmate's
consent unless an inmate's death is being investigated by the Public Counsel or
Inspector General. The office of Public Counsel and the office of Inspector
General of the Nebraska Correctional System shall not disclose an inmate's
medical or mental health records to anyone else, including any person committed
to the department, except as authorized by law.
Sec. 102. Section 83-1,125.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
83-1,125.01 (1) The Board of Parole and the department Division of Parole
Supervision may maintain an individual file for each person who is under the
jurisdiction of the Board of Parole. Such file may be maintained electronically
and shall include, when available and appropriate, the following information on
such person:
(a) Admission summary;
(b) Presentence investigation report;
(c) Classification reports and recommendations;
(d) Official records of conviction and commitment along with any earlier
criminal records;
-42-

LB298 LB298
2025 2025
(e) Progress reports and admission-orientation reports;
(f) Reports of any disciplinary infractions and their disposition;
(g) Risk and needs assessments;
(h) Parole plan and parole placement and investigation worksheets;
(i) Decision guideline scores;
(j) Parole case plan;
(k) Parole progress reports and contact notes;
(l) Arrest and violation reports, including disposition;
(m) Parole proceedings orders and notices;
(n) Other documents related to parole supervision;
(o) Correspondence; and
(p) Other pertinent data concerning his or her background, conduct,
associations, and family relationships.
(2) Any decision concerning release on or revocation of parole or
imposition of sanctions shall be made only after the individual file has been
reviewed. The contents of the individual file shall be confidential unless
disclosed in connection with a public hearing and shall not be subject to
public inspection except by court order for good cause shown. The contents of
the file shall not be accessible to any person under the jurisdiction of the
Board of Parole. A person under the jurisdiction of the board may obtain access
to his or her medical records by request to the provider pursuant to sections
71-8401 to 71-8407 notwithstanding the fact that such medical records may be a
part of his or her parole file. The board and the department Division of Parole
Supervision have the authority to withhold decision guideline scores, risk and
needs assessment scores, and mental health and psychological records of a
person under the jurisdiction of the board when appropriate.
(3) Nothing in this section limits in any manner the authority of the
Public Counsel to inspect and examine the records and documents of the board
and the department Division of Parole Supervision pursuant to the Office of
Public Counsel Act sections 81-8,240 to 81-8,254, except that the Public
Counsel's access to the medical or mental health records of a person under the
jurisdiction of the board shall be subject to his or her consent. The office of
Public Counsel shall not disclose the medical or mental health records of a
person under the jurisdiction of the board to anyone else, including any other
person under the jurisdiction of the board, except as authorized by law.
(4) For any person under the jurisdiction of the Board of Parole, the
board shall provide such person's (a) name, (b) parole officer, and (c)
conditions of parole to the Nebraska Commission on Law Enforcement and Criminal
Justice which shall provide access to such information to law enforcement
agencies through the state's criminal justice information system.
Sec. 103. Section 84-304, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
84-304 It shall be the duty of the Auditor of Public Accounts:
(1) To give information electronically to the Legislature, whenever
required, upon any subject relating to the fiscal affairs of the state or with
regard to any duty of his or her office;
(2) To furnish offices for himself or herself and all fuel, lights, books,
blanks, forms, paper, and stationery required for the proper discharge of the
duties of his or her office;
(3)(a) To examine or cause to be examined, at such time as he or she shall
determine, books, accounts, vouchers, records, and expenditures of all state
officers, state bureaus, state boards, state commissioners, the state library,
societies and associations supported by the state, state institutions, state
colleges, and the University of Nebraska, except when required to be performed
by other officers or persons. Such examinations shall be done in accordance
with generally accepted government auditing standards for financial audits and
attestation engagements set forth in Government Auditing Standards (2011
Revision for audit periods ending before June 30, 2020, or 2018 Revision for
audit periods ending on or after June 30, 2020), published by the Comptroller
General of the United States, Government Accountability Office, and except as
provided in subdivision (11) of this section, subdivision (16) of section
50-1205, and section 84-322, shall not include performance audits, whether
conducted pursuant to attestation engagements or performance audit standards as
set forth in Government Auditing Standards (2018 Revision), published by the
Comptroller General of the United States, Government Accountability Office.
(b) Any entity, excluding the state colleges and the University of
Nebraska, that is audited or examined pursuant to subdivision (3)(a) of this
section and that is the subject of a comment and recommendation in a management
letter or report issued by the Auditor of Public Accounts shall, on or before
six months after the issuance of such letter or report, provide to the Auditor
of Public Accounts a detailed written description of any corrective action
taken or to be taken in response to the comment and recommendation. The Auditor
of Public Accounts may investigate and evaluate the corrective action. The
Auditor of Public Accounts shall then electronically submit a report of any
findings of such investigation and evaluation to the Governor, the appropriate
standing committee of the Legislature, and the Appropriations Committee of the
Legislature. The Auditor of Public Accounts shall also ensure that the report
is delivered to the Appropriations Committee for entry into the record during
the committee's budget hearing process;
(4)(a) To examine or cause to be examined, at the expense of the political
subdivision, when the Auditor of Public Accounts determines such examination
necessary or when requested by the political subdivision, the books, accounts,
vouchers, records, and expenditures of any agricultural association formed
-43-

LB298 LB298
2025 2025
under Chapter 2, article 20, any county agricultural society, any joint airport
authority formed under the Joint Airport Authorities Act, any city or county
airport authority, any bridge commission created pursuant to section 39-868,
any cemetery district, any community redevelopment authority or limited
community redevelopment authority established under the Community Development
Law, any development district, any drainage district, any local public health
department as defined in section 71-1626, any historical society, any hospital
authority or district, any county hospital, any housing agency as defined in
section 71-1575, any irrigation district, any county or municipal library, any
community mental health center, any railroad transportation safety district,
any rural water district, any township, Wyuka Cemetery, the Educational Service
Unit Coordinating Council, any entity created pursuant to the Interlocal
Cooperation Act, any educational service unit, any village, any service
contractor or subrecipient of state or federal funds, any political subdivision
with the authority to levy a property tax or a toll, or any entity created
pursuant to the Joint Public Agency Act.
For purposes of this subdivision, service contractor or subrecipient means
any nonprofit entity that expends state or federal funds to carry out a state
or federal program or function, but it does not include an individual who is a
direct beneficiary of such a program or function or a licensed health care
provider or facility receiving direct payment for medical services provided for
a specific individual.
(b) The Auditor of Public Accounts may waive the audit requirement of
subdivision (4)(a) of this section upon the submission by the political
subdivision of a written request in a form prescribed by the auditor. The
auditor shall notify the political subdivision in writing of the approval or
denial of the request for a waiver.
(c) Through December 31, 2017, the Auditor of Public Accounts may conduct
audits under this subdivision for purposes of sections 2-3228, 12-101, 13-2402,
14-567, 14-1805.01, 14-2111, 16-1017, 16-1037, 19-3501, 23-1118, 23-3526,
71-1631.02, and 79-987.
(d) Beginning on May 24, 2017, the Auditor of Public Accounts may conduct
audits under this subdivision for purposes of sections 13-2402, 14-567,
14-1805.01, 14-2111, 15-1017, 16-1017, 16-1037, 18-814, 71-1631.02, and 79-987
and shall prescribe the form for the annual reports required in each of such
sections. Such annual reports shall be published annually on the website of the
Auditor of Public Accounts;
(5) To report promptly to the Governor and the appropriate standing
committee of the Legislature the fiscal condition shown by such examinations
conducted by the auditor, including any irregularities or misconduct of
officers or employees, any misappropriation or misuse of public funds or
property, and any improper system or method of bookkeeping or condition of
accounts. The report submitted to the committee shall be submitted
electronically. In addition, if, in the normal course of conducting an audit in
accordance with subdivision (3) of this section, the auditor discovers any
potential problems related to the effectiveness, efficiency, or performance of
state programs, he or she shall immediately report them electronically to the
Legislative Oversight Performance Audit Committee which may investigate the
issue further, report it electronically to the appropriate standing committee
of the Legislature, or both;
(6)(a) To examine or cause to be examined the books, accounts, vouchers,
records, and expenditures of a fire protection district. The expense of the
examination shall be paid by the political subdivision.
(b) Whenever the expenditures of a fire protection district are one
hundred fifty thousand dollars or less per fiscal year, the fire protection
district shall be audited no more than once every five years except as directed
by the board of directors of the fire protection district or unless the auditor
receives a verifiable report from a third party indicating any irregularities
or misconduct of officers or employees of the fire protection district, any
misappropriation or misuse of public funds or property, or any improper system
or method of bookkeeping or condition of accounts of the fire protection
district. In the absence of such a report, the auditor may waive the five-year
audit requirement upon the submission of a written request by the fire
protection district in a form prescribed by the auditor. The auditor shall
notify the fire protection district in writing of the approval or denial of a
request for waiver of the five-year audit requirement. Upon approval of the
request for waiver of the five-year audit requirement, a new five-year audit
period shall begin.
(c) Whenever the expenditures of a fire protection district exceed one
hundred fifty thousand dollars in a fiscal year, the auditor may waive the
audit requirement upon the submission of a written request by the fire
protection district in a form prescribed by the auditor. The auditor shall
notify the fire protection district in writing of the approval or denial of a
request for waiver. Upon approval of the request for waiver, a new five-year
audit period shall begin for the fire protection district if its expenditures
are one hundred fifty thousand dollars or less per fiscal year in subsequent
years;
(7) To appoint two or more assistant deputies (a) whose entire time shall
be devoted to the service of the state as directed by the auditor, (b) who
shall be certified public accountants with at least five years' experience, (c)
who shall be selected without regard to party affiliation or to place of
residence at the time of appointment, (d) who shall promptly report to the
auditor the fiscal condition shown by each examination, including any
-44-

LB298 LB298
2025 2025
irregularities or misconduct of officers or employees, any misappropriation or
misuse of public funds or property, and any improper system or method of
bookkeeping or condition of accounts, and it shall be the duty of the auditor
to file promptly with the Governor a duplicate of such report, and (e) who
shall qualify by taking an oath which shall be filed in the office of the
Secretary of State;
(8) To conduct audits and related activities for state agencies, political
subdivisions of this state, or grantees of federal funds disbursed by a
receiving agency on a contractual or other basis for reimbursement to assure
proper accounting by all such agencies, political subdivisions, and grantees
for funds appropriated by the Legislature and federal funds disbursed by any
receiving agency. The auditor may contract with any political subdivision to
perform the audit of such political subdivision required by or provided for in
section 23-1608 or 79-1229 or this section and charge the political subdivision
for conducting the audit. The fees charged by the auditor for conducting audits
on a contractual basis shall be in an amount sufficient to pay the cost of the
audit. The fees remitted to the auditor for such audits and services shall be
deposited in the Auditor of Public Accounts Cash Fund;
(9)(a) To examine or cause to be examined the books, accounts, vouchers,
and records related to any money transferred pursuant to subsection (2) or (4)
of section 79-3501, any fund receiving any such transfer, or any subsequent
transfer or expenditure of such money when the Auditor of Public Accounts
determines such examination necessary or when requested by (i) any department
or agency receiving any such transfer or acting as the administrator for a fund
receiving any such transfer, (ii) any recipient or subsequent recipient of
money disbursed from any such fund, or (iii) any service contractor responsible
for managing, on behalf of any entity, any portion of any such fund or any
money disbursed from any such fund.
(b) Any examination pursuant to subdivision (9)(a) of this section shall
be made at the expense of the department or agency, recipient or subsequent
recipient, or service contractor whose books, accounts, vouchers, or records
are being examined.
(c) For purposes of this subdivision, recipient, subsequent recipient, or
service contractor means a nonprofit entity that expends funds transferred
pursuant to subsection (2) or (4) of section 79-3501 to carry out a state
program or function, but does not include an individual who is a direct
beneficiary of such a program or function.
(d) The Auditor of Public Accounts shall prescribe the form for the annual
reports required in subsection (6) of section 79-3501. Such annual reports
shall be published on the website of the Auditor of Public Accounts;
(10) To develop and maintain an annual budget and actual financial
information reporting system for political subdivisions that is accessible
online by the public;
(11) When authorized, to conduct joint audits with the Legislative
Oversight Performance Audit Committee as described in section 50-1205;
(12) Unless otherwise specifically provided, to assess the interest rate
on delinquent payments of any fees for audits and services owing to the Auditor
of Public Accounts at a rate of fourteen percent per annum from the date of
billing unless paid within thirty days after the date of billing. For an entity
created pursuant to the Interlocal Cooperation Act or the Joint Public Agency
Act, any participating public agencies shall be jointly and severally liable
for the fees and interest owed if such entity is defunct or unable to pay; and
(13) In consultation with statewide associations representing (a) counties
and (b) cities and villages, to approve annual continuing education programs
for county treasurers, city treasurers, and village treasurers as required by
sections 14-553, 15-317, 16-318, 17-606, and 23-1601. The cost of attending
such programs shall be at the expense of the county, city, or village. The
auditor shall maintain records of program attendance and notify each county
board, city council, or village board of trustees if its treasurer has not
completed such program attendance. The auditor shall inform the Attorney
General and the county attorney of the county in which a treasurer is located
if such treasurer has not completed a required annual continuing education
program.
Sec. 104. Section 84-311, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
84-311 (1)(a) All final audit reports issued by the Auditor of Public
Accounts shall be maintained permanently as a public record in the office of
the Auditor of Public Accounts.
(b) Working papers and other audit files maintained by the Auditor of
Public Accounts are not public records and are exempt from sections 84-712 to
84-712.05. The information contained in working papers and audit files prepared
pursuant to a specific audit is not subject to disclosure except to a county
attorney or the Attorney General in connection with an investigation made or
action taken in the course of the attorney's official duties or to the
Legislative Oversight Performance Audit Committee in the course of the
committee's official duties and pursuant to the requirements of subdivision
(16) of section 50-1205 or subdivision (5) of section 84-304.
(c) A public entity being audited and any federal agency that has made a
grant to such public entity shall also have access to the relevant working
papers and audit files, except that such access shall not include information
that would disclose or otherwise indicate the identity of any individual who
has confidentially provided the Auditor of Public Accounts with allegations of
wrongdoing regarding, or other information pertaining to, the public entity
-45-

LB298 LB298
2025 2025
being audited.
(d) The Auditor of Public Accounts may, at his or her discretion, share
working papers, other than personal information and telephone records, with the
Legislative Council. The Auditor of Public Accounts may, at his or her
discretion, share working papers with the Attorney General, the Internal
Revenue Service, the Tax Commissioner, the Federal Bureau of Investigation, a
law enforcement agency as defined in section 28-359, and the Nebraska
Accountability and Disclosure Commission. The working papers may be shared with
such entities during an ongoing audit or after the final audit report is
issued. The Auditor of Public Accounts shall not, under the authority granted
in this subdivision, reveal sealed or confidential court records contained in
working papers.
(e) For purposes of this subsection, working papers means those documents
containing evidence to support the auditor's findings, opinions, conclusions,
and judgments and includes the collection of evidence prepared or obtained by
the auditor during the audit.
(f) The Auditor of Public Accounts may make the working papers available
for purposes of an external quality control review as required by generally
accepted government auditing standards. However, any reports made from such
external quality control review shall not make public any information which
would be considered confidential under this section when in the possession of
the Auditor of Public Accounts.
(2) If the Auditor of Public Accounts or any employee of the Auditor of
Public Accounts knowingly divulges or makes known in any manner not permitted
by law any record, document, or information, the disclosure of which is
restricted by law, he or she is subject to the same penalties provided in
section 84-712.09.
Sec. 105. Section 84-322, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
84-322 The Auditor of Public Accounts, when expressly authorized by a
majority vote of the members of the Legislative Oversight Performance Audit
Committee, may conduct performance audits of state executive branch offices,
state agencies, state bureaus, state boards, state commissions, the state
library, societies and associations supported by the state, state institutions,
state colleges, and the University of Nebraska. The auditor shall issue the
performance audit report to the Governor, the appropriate standing committee of
the Legislature, and the Legislative Oversight Performance Audit Committee. The
report submitted to the committees of the Legislature shall be submitted
electronically.
Sec. 106. Section 84-910, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
84-910 (1) On or before July 1 of each year, each agency shall notify the
Legislative Oversight Performance Audit Committee of the status of all rules
and regulations pending before the agency that are required by law and that
have not been adopted and promulgated. If such rules and regulations have not
been adopted and promulgated within the time required pursuant to section
84-901.01, the agency shall provide an explanation to the committee stating why
the agency has not adopted and promulgated such rules and regulations. If an
additional appropriation was made with respect to legislation enacted to
provide funding for or additional staff to implement a program for which rules
and regulations are required to be adopted, the notification shall include what
the funding has been used for and what functions the staff have been performing
while such rules and regulations are pending. The format of the notification
shall be established by the committee and shall be updated periodically.
(2) On or before July 1 of each year, each agency shall notify the
Executive Board of the Legislative Council of the status of any rule or
regulation pending before the agency that constitutes an occupational
regulation as defined in section 84-940 and that has not been adopted and
promulgated. The executive board shall forward any notification received
pursuant to this subsection to the standing committee of the Legislature with
jurisdiction over such rule or regulation.
Sec. 107. The Revisor of Statutes shall assign sections 1 to 65 of this
act to Chapter 50.
Sec. 108. Original sections 28-711, 43-4302, 43-4303, 43-4317, 43-4320,
43-4321, 43-4322, 43-4324, 43-4326, 43-4329, 43-4330, 47-901, 47-902, 47-903,
47-904, 47-905, 47-907, 47-908, 47-909, 47-910, 47-911, 47-912, 47-913, 47-914,
47-915, 47-916, 47-917, 47-918, 47-920, 50-406, 50-406.01, 50-407, 50-408,
50-409, 50-410, 50-416, 50-418, 50-420, 50-1201, 50-1202, 50-1203, 50-1204,
50-1205, 50-1205.01, 50-1206, 50-1210, 50-1211, 50-1212, 50-1213, 50-1303,
50-1304, 73-401, 81-8,240, 81-8,241, 81-8,242, 81-8,243, 81-8,244, 81-8,245,
81-8,246, 81-8,247, 81-8,248, 81-8,249, 81-8,250, 81-8,251, 81-8,252, 81-8,253,
81-8,254, 81-1114, 83-178, 83-1,125.01, 84-304, 84-311, 84-322, and 84-910,
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, and sections 28-712.01, 29-2011.02,
29-2011.03, 43-2,108, 43-4301, 43-4318, 43-4323, 43-4325, 43-4327, 43-4328,
43-4331, 43-4332, 50-401.01, 50-402, 50-1209, 77-2711, and 77-27,119, Revised
Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, are repealed.
Sec. 109. The following sections are outright repealed: Sections 43-4304,
43-4304.01, 43-4304.02, 43-4305, 43-4306, 43-4306.01, 43-4307, 43-4307.01,
43-4308, 43-4309, 43-4310, 43-4311, 43-4312, 43-4313, 43-4314, 43-4315,
43-4316, 43-4319, 47-906, 47-919, and 50-421, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska.
Sec. 110. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when passed
and approved according to law.
-46-